Thrombelastography (TEG) or thromboelastometry (ROTEM) to monitor haemotherapy versus usual care in patients with massive transfusion.Severe bleeding and coagulopathy as a result of massive transfusion are serious clinical conditions that are associated with high mortality. Thromboelastography (TEG) and thromboelastometry (ROTEM) are increasingly used to guide transfusion strategy but their roles remain disputed.To systematically assess the benefits and harms of a TEG or ROTEM guided transfusion strategy in randomized trials involving patients with severe bleeding.Randomized clinical trials (RCTs) were identified from electronic databases: Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL) (The Cochrane Library 2010, Issue 9); MEDLINE; EMBASE; Science Citation Index Expanded; International Web of Science; CINAHL; LILACS; and the Chinese Biomedical Literature Database (up to 31st October 2010). We contacted trial authors, authors of previous reviews, and manufacturers in the field.We included all RCTs, irrespective of blinding or language, that compared transfusion guided by TEG or ROTEM to transfusion guided by clinical judgement and standard laboratory tests, or both.Two authors independently abstracted data; they resolved any disagreements by discussion. We presented pooled estimates of the intervention effects on dichotomous outcomes as relative risks (RR) and on continuous outcomes as mean differences, with 95% confidence intervals (CI). Our primary outcome measure was all cause mortality. We performed subgroup and sensitivity analyses to assess the effect of TEG or ROTEM in adults and children on various clinical and physiological outcomes. We assessed the risk of bias through assessment of trial methodological components and the risk of random error through trial sequential analysis.We included nine RCTs with a total of 776 participants; only one trial had a low risk of bias. We found two ongoing trials but were unable to retrieve any data from them. Compared with standard treatment, TEG or ROTEM showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (3.78% versus 5.11%, RR 0.77, 95% CI 0.35 to 1.72; I(2) = 0%) but only five trials provided data on mortality. Our analyses demonstrated a statistically significant effect of TEG or ROTEM on the amount of bleeding (MD -85.05 ml, 95% CI -140.68 to -29.42; I(2) = 26%) but failed to show any statistically significant effect on other predefined outcomes.There is an absence of evidence that TEG or ROTEM improves morbidity or mortality in patients with severe bleeding. Application of a TEG or ROTEM guided transfusion strategy seems to reduce the amount of bleeding but whether this has implications for the clinical condition of patients is still uncertain. More research is needed.Splenectomy leads to a persistent hypercoagulable state after trauma.It was hypothesized that splenectomy following trauma results in hypercoagulability.A prospective, nonrandomized, single-center study was performed to evaluate coagulation parameters in trauma patients with splenic injury.Patients with splenectomy (n = 30) and nonoperative management (n = 50) were enrolled. Splenectomy patients were older, had higher Injury Severity Scores, and had longer intensive care unit and hospital stays (P < .05). Splenectomy patients had significantly increased white blood cell counts and platelet counts at baseline and follow-up (P < .01). Fibrinogen was initially elevated in both groups and remained elevated in the splenectomy group (P < .05). Tissue plasminogen activator, plasminogen activator inhibitor-1, and activated partial thromboplastin time were higher in splenectomy patients only at baseline (P < .05). Baseline thromboelastography showed faster fibrin cross-linking and enhanced fibrinolysis following splenectomy (P < .05). Only clot strength was greater at follow-up in the splenectomy group (P < .01). Deep venous thrombosis developed in 7% of splenectomy patients and no control patients (P = .03).A significant difference in deep venous thrombosis formation was noted, and coagulation assays indicated persistent hypercoagulability following splenectomy for trauma.The prognostic value of thrombelastography in identifying neurosurgical patients with worse prognosis.Coagulopathy in patients with intracranial haemorrhage or traumatic brain injury (TBI) is associated with clinical deterioration and worse outcome. Whole blood viscoelastic haemostatic assays, like thrombelastography (TEG), might aid conventional coagulation assays in identification of patients with worse prognosis. We performed a review of patients (totalling 78 patients) with primary acute intracranial haemorrhage or isolated TBI admitted to a neurointensive care unit (NICU) for more than 24 h during a period of 9 months, who had TEG analysis performed at admission. Primary outcome was all-cause 30-day mortality, whereas decline in Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) score at 24 h after admission or death due to cerebral incarceration were secondary outcomes. Patients were defined as hypocoaguable if TEG reaction time was more than 8 min, angle less than 55° and/or maximal amplitude less than 51 mm. Patients were defined hypocoaguable according to conventional coagulation assays if international normalized ratio was more than 1.3, platelet counts less than 100×10/l and/or activated partial thromboplastine time more than 35 s. Eight patients were hypocoaguable by TEG on admission to NICU and had higher 30-day mortality (63% vs. 16%, P=0.008), more often declined in GCS (57% vs. 16%, P=0.02) and expired due to cerebral incarceration (50% vs. 6%, P=0.02). Hypocoagulability by TEG, lower admission GCS and subarachnoid haemorrhage were independently associated with higher 30-day mortality [TEG: odds ratio (OR) 14.8 (2.2-100.1), P=0.006; GCS: OR 1.3 (1.1-1.5), P=0.006; subarachnoid haemorrhage: OR: 5.3 (1.3-22.3), P=0.02]. Only two patients were hypocoaguable by both conventional coagulation assays and TEG. The current data indicate that hypocoagulability by TEG at admission to NICU predicts worse prognosis. Low concordance with conventional coagulation assays indicates that TEG might be valuable in identifying patients with clinically relevant coagulopathy.A novel thromboelastographic score to identify overt disseminated intravascular coagulation resulting in a hypocoagulable state.Thromboelastography (TEM) yields a multitude of data that are complicated to analyze. We evaluated its value in identification of global coagulopathy in overt disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC). We studied 21 patients, each with International Society for Haemostasis and Thrombosis scores of 5 or more (compatible with overt DIC) and less than 5 (suggestive of nonovert DIC), who underwent whole blood nonadditive TEM. A TEM score based on the reaction and kappa times, alpha angle, and maximum amplitude was defined as the total number of TEM parameters deranged in the direction of hypocoagulability. The TEM score at a cutoff of 2 or more achieved sensitivity of 95.2%, specificity of 81.0%, and the highest receiver operating characteristic area under the curve of all parameters of 0.957 for identifying overt DIC. Individual TEM parameters correlated variably with conventional tests. Their combination into a cohesive TEM score possibly better captured the multiple hemostatic derangements occurring in DIC. The TEM score may bring objectivity to the analysis of TEM data.Rotational thromboelastometry (ROTEM)-based coagulation management in cardiac surgery and major trauma.Early evaluation of acute traumatic coagulopathy by thrombelastography.Posttraumatic coagulopathy is a major cause of morbidity. This prospective study evaluated the thrombelastography (TEG) system and PlateletMapping (Haemoscope Corporation, Niles, Ill) values posttrauma, and it correlated those values with transfusions and fatalities. After institutional review board approval, assays were performed on 161 trauma patients. One citrated blood sample was collected onsite (OS), and 1 citrate and 1 heparinized sample were collected within 1 h of arrival to the emergency department (ED). Paired and unpaired t-testing was performed for nominal data with chi square testing for categorical values. Except for a slight increase in clot strength (maximal amplitude (MA)), there were no significant changes from OS to the ED. None of the TEG parameters were significantly different for the 22 patients who required transfusion. PlateletMapping showed lower platelet adenosine diphosphate (ADP) responsiveness in patients who needed transfusions (MA = 22.7 +/- 17.1 vs MA = 35.7 +/- 19.3, P = 0.004) and a correlation of fibrinogen <100 mg/dL with fatalities (P = 0.013). For the 14 fatalities, TEG reaction (R) time was 3703 +/- 11,618 versus 270 +/- 393 s (P = < 0.001), and MA was 46.4 +/- 22.4 versus 64.7 +/- 9.8 mm (P < 0.001). Hyperfibrinolysis (percent fibrinolysis after 60 min (LY60) >15%) was observed in 3 patients in the ED with a 67% fatality rate (P = < 0.001 by chi-square testing). PlateletMapping assays correlated with the need for blood transfusion. The abnormal TEG System parameters correlated with fatality. These coagulopathies were already evident OS. The TEG assays can assess coagulopathy, platelet dysfunction, and hyperfibrinolysis at an early stage posttrauma and suggest more effective interventions.Combining early coagulation and inflammatory status improves prediction of mortality in burned and nonburned trauma patients.After injury, there is a synergistic response between inflammation and coagulation systems. We hypothesized that combining markers of these processes and standard clinical indices would improve early prediction of in- hospital mortality in burned and nonburned trauma patients.Patients admitted to the surgical or burn intensive care unit within 24 hours of injury with an anticipated stay >or=3 days were enrolled during a one year period. Upon admission, blood was drawn for thromboelastography, plasma-based clotting assays, and cytokine levels. Clinical indices and multiple organ dysfunction syndrome (MODS) scores were recorded. Candidate variables evaluated included age, percentage third degree burns, inhalation injury, percentage total body surface area burns, interleukin-6, tumor necrosis factor alpha, interleukin-8, prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time (PTT), maximal amplitude reflective of clot strength, group (burn or nonburn) and admission MODS. Multiple logistic regression with stepwise selection and likelihood ratio test was performed to identify predictors for mortality. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was constructed to assess the diagnostic performance of identified predictors. Validation of the model with an additional cohort was performed.For model development, we enrolled 25 burned and 33 nonburned trauma patients (20 blunt and 13 penetrating injuries). Fifteen deaths occurred. Multiple logistic regression analysis identified six independent risk factors for death: age, percentage third degree burns, inhalation injury, tumor necrosis factor alpha level, maximal amplitude, and MODS score with an area under ROC curve of 0.961 (95% confidence interval: 0.891, 1.000, p < 0.05). The area under the ROC curve for the validation cohort (n = 66) was 0.936 (95% confidence interval: 0.875, 0.997, p < 0.001).Our model improves prediction of in-hospital mortality in comparison to previous methods for burn and nonburn trauma patients. Furthermore, our model is equally applicable to all patients regardless of type of traumatic injury (nonburn or burn). This improvement is because of the inclusion of patient's early coagulation and inflammatory status in addition to standard clinical indices. These data provide a baseline within which to measure incremental improvements in care.Hyperfibrinolysis diagnosed by rotational thromboelastometry (ROTEM) is associated with higher mortality in patients with severe trauma.We investigated whether hyperfibrinolysis and its severity was associated with outcome of traumatized and nontraumatized patients.From April 2008 to April 2010, all emergency patients with hyperfibrinolysis were enrolled in this study. Hyperfibrinolysis patients were divided into traumatized (trauma hyperfibrinolysis group) and nontraumatized (nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group). The trauma hyperfibrinolysis group was matched with 24 polytrauma patients without hyperfibrinolysis (matched trauma group). Data from rotational thromboelastometry measurements, blood gas analysis (metabolic state), laboratory analysis, injury severity score, and 30-day mortality were collected.Thirty-five patients with hyperfibrinolysis were identified (13 traumatized, 22 nontraumatized). Overall mortality for hyperfibrinolysis was 54%. Mortality in the trauma hyperfibrinolysis group (77%±12%) was significantly higher than in the nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group (41%±10%; P=0.001, 95% CI 5%-67%) and the matched trauma group (33%±10%; P=0.009, 95% CI 13%-74%). Hyperfibrinolysis is significantly (P=0.017) associated with mortality in trauma patients. In the blood gas analysis representing the metabolic state, only pH (P=0.02) and potassium (P=0.01) were significantly lower in the trauma hyperfibrinolysis group compared to the nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group.Mortality from hyperfibrinolysis is significantly higher in trauma compared with nontrauma patients, and hyperfibrinolysis is an independent factor predicting mortality in trauma patients. Rotational thromboelastometry provides real-time recognition of hyperfibrinolysis allowing early treatment.The incidence and magnitude of fibrinolytic activation in trauma patients.Trauma is a global disease, with over 2.5 million deaths annually from hemorrhage and coagulopathy. Overt hyperfibrinolysis is rare in trauma, and is associated with massive fatal injuries. Paradoxically, clinical trials suggest a much broader indication for antifibrinolytics.To determine the incidence and magnitude of fibrinolytic activation in trauma patients and its relationship to clot lysis as measured by thromboelastometry.A prospective cohort study of 303 consecutive trauma patients admitted between January 2007 and June 2009 was performed. Blood was drawn on arrival for thromboelastometry (TEM) and coagulation assays. Follow-up was until hospital discharge or death. TEM hyperfibrinolysis was defined as maximum clot lysis of > 15%. Fibrinolytic activation (FA) was determined according to plasmin-antiplasmin (PAP) complex and D-dimer levels. Data were collected on demographics, mechanism, severity of injury, and baseline vital signs. The primary outcome measure was 28-day mortality. The secondary outcome measures were 28-day ventilator-free days and 24-h transfusion requirement.Only 5% of patients had severe fibrinolysis on TEM, but 57% of patients had evidence of 'moderate' fibrinolysis, with PAP complex levels elevated to over twice normal (> 1500 μg L(-1)) without lysis on TEM. TEM detected clot lysis only when PAP complex levels were increased to 30 times normal (P < 0.001) and antiplasmin levels were < 75% of normal. Patients with FA had increased 28-day mortality as compared with those with no FA (12% vs. 1%, P < 0.001), fewer ventilator-free days, and longer hospital stay.FA occurs in the majority of trauma patients, and the magnitude of FA correlates with poor clinical outcome. This was not detected by conventional TEM, which is an insensitive measure of endogenous fibrinolytic activity.A reduction in clot formation rate and strength assessed by thrombelastography is indicative of transfusion requirements in patients with penetrating injuries.Bleeding is a major cause of death in patients with traumatic injuries. Recently, thrombelastography (TEG) has been suggested as an additional means of evaluating coagulation in trauma patients. We hypothesized that TEG data would aid in defining the coagulopathy of trauma in patients with penetrating traumatic injuries.A retrospective study was performed of patients (n = 44) with penetrating injuries admitted to a combat support hospital during a 2-month period in 2004. Recorded data included standard laboratory data, TEG parameters, and blood product use in the first 24 hours after admission. Values were compared with clinically accepted ranges and those obtained from the Haemoscope Corporation.At admission, International Normalization Ratio, prothrombin time, and partial thromboplastin time were increased in 39% (>or=1.5), 31% (>16 seconds), and 37% (>40 seconds) of patients, respectively, suggesting hypocoagulation, but these variables did not correlate with the use of blood products (p > 0.05). TEG values obtained within 24 hours of admission (6 hours +/- 5.7 hours; median of 4.5 hours) demonstrated hypocoagulation based on delayed propagation of the clot (increased K time and reduced alpha-angle) and decreased clot strength (reduced maximal amplitude [MA]). MA correlated (r = 0.57, p < 0.01) with blood product use as well as platelet count (r = 0.61, p < 0.01). Patients with reduced MA (n = 23) used more blood products and had reduced platelet counts and hematocrit.Thrombelastography was a more accurate indicator of blood product requirements in our patient population than prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time, and International Normalization Ratio. Thrombelastography enhanced by platelet count and hematocrit can guide blood transfusion requirements.Coagulation disorders in severely and critically injured patients.Forty-five patients with multiple injuries treated at an intensive care unit were studied prospectively. The patients were divided into two groups: the severely injured (no mortality) and critically injured (56% mortality). Treatment was started within two hours from the accident in all cases. The following coagulation parameters were measured for eight days: euglobulin lysis time (ELT), thromboelastography (TEG), vecalcification time (RECA), partial thromboplastin time (PTT), factor V, factor VIII, Normotest, Thrombotest, thrombin time, fibrinogen and platelets. Severe coagulation disorders were observed in one-third of the patients 12-48 hours after trauma. The abnormalities were more pronounced in patients who had sustained very severe injuries and arrived in a state of shock. The ELT was shortened 0-6 hours after the accident and accelerated coagulation was indicated simultaneously by decreased PTT, RECA, and r-values as well as by elevated Thrombotest and factor VIII values. The factor V and fibrinogen levels were initially lowered. Low platelet values at 2-4 days, prolonged thrombin and r-times, secondary decrease of fibrinogen FV, FVIII, and low Thrombotest values suggested disseminated intravascular coagulation associated with complications, such as fat embolism and "shock lung" syndromes. General bleeding tendency with high mortality was observed in 16% of the patients.TEG-guided resuscitation is superior to standardized MTP resuscitation in massively transfused penetrating trauma patients.For nearly a decade, our center performed thromboelastograms (TEGs) to analyze coagulation profiles, allowing rapid data-driven blood component therapy. After consensus recommendations for massive transfusion protocols (MTPs), we implemented an MTP in October 2009 with 1:1:1 ratio of blood (red blood cells [RBC]), plasma (fresh-frozen plasma [FFP]), and platelets. We hypothesized that TEG-directed resuscitation is equivalent to MTP resuscitation.All patients receiving 6 units (U) or more of RBC in the first 24 hours for 21 months before and after MTP initiation in an urban Level I trauma center were examined. Demographics, mechanism of injury (MOI), Injury Severity Score (ISS), 24-hour volume of RBC, FFP, platelets, crystalloid, and 30-day mortality were compared, excluding patients with traumatic brain injuries. Variables were analyzed using Student's t-test and χ2 or Fisher's exact test.For the preMTP group, there were 165 patients. In the MTP group, there were 124 patients. There were no significant differences in ISS, age, or sex. PreMTP patients with 6U or more RBC had significantly more penetrating MOI (p = 0.017), whereas preMTP patients with 10U or more RBC had similar MOIs. All patients received less crystalloid after MTP adoption (p < 0.001). There was no difference in volume of blood products or mortality in patients receiving 6U or more RBC. Blunt trauma MTP patients who received 10U or more RBC received more FFP (p = 0.02), with no change in mortality. Penetrating trauma patients who received 10U or more RBC received a similar volume of FFP; however, mortality increased from 54.1% for MTP versus 33.3% preMTP (p = 0.04).TEG-directed resuscitation is equivalent to standardized MTP for patients receiving 6U or more RBC and for blunt MOI patients receiving 10U or more RBC. MTP therapy worsened mortality in penetrating MOI patients receiving 10U or more RBC, indicating a continued need for TEG-directed therapy. A 1:1:1 strategy may not be adequate in all patients.Therapeutic study, level IV.The Rapid TEG α-Angle may be a sensitive predictor of transfusion in moderately injured blunt trauma patients.To guide the administration of blood products, coagulation screening of trauma patients should be fast and accurate. The purpose of this study was to identify the correlation between CCT and TEG in trauma, to determine which CCT or TEG parameter is most sensitive in predicting transfusion in trauma, and to define TEG cut-off points for trauma care.A six-month, prospective observational study of 76 adult patients with suspected multiple injuries was conducted at a Level 1 trauma centre of a university hospital. Physicians blinded to TEG results made the decision to transfuse based on clinical evaluation.The study results showed that conventional coagulation tests correlate moderately with Rapid TEG parameters (R: 0.44-0.61). Kaolin and Rapid TEG were more sensitive than CCTs, and the Rapid TEG α-Angle was identified as the single parameter with the greatest sensitivity (84%) and validity (77%) at a cut-off of 74.7 degrees. When the Rapid TEG α-Angle was combined with heart rate >75 bpm, or haematocrit < 41%, sensitivity (84%, 88%) and specificity (75%, 73%) were improved.Cutoff points for transfusion can be determined with the Rapid TEG α-Angle and can provide better sensitivity than CCTs, but a larger study population is needed to reproduce this finding.FIBTEM provides early prediction of massive transfusion in trauma.Prediction of massive transfusion (MT) among trauma patients is difficult in the early phase of trauma management. Whole-blood thromboelastometry (ROTEM®) tests provide immediate information about the coagulation status of acute bleeding trauma patients. We investigated their value for early prediction of MT.This retrospective study included patients admitted to the AUVA Trauma Centre, Salzburg, Austria, with an injury severity score ≥16, from whom blood samples were taken immediately upon admission to the emergency room (ER). ROTEM® analyses (extrinsically-activated test with tissue factor (EXTEM), intrinsically-activated test using ellagic acid (INTEM) and fibrin-based extrinsically activated test with tissue factor and the platelet inhibitor cytochalasin D (FIBTEM) tests) were performed. We divided patients into two groups: massive transfusion (MT, those who received ≥10 units red blood cell concentrate within 24 hours of admission) and non-MT (those who received 0 to 9 units).Of 323 patients included in this study (78.9% male; median age 44 years), 78 were included in the MT group and 245 in the non-MT group. The median injury severity score upon admission to the ER was significantly higher in the MT group than in the non-MT group (42 vs 27, P < 0.0001). EXTEM and INTEM clotting time and clot formation time were significantly prolonged and maximum clot firmness (MCF) was significantly lower in the MT group versus the non-MT group (P < 0.0001 for all comparisons). Of patients admitted with FIBTEM MCF 0 to 3 mm, 85% received MT. The best predictive values for MT were provided by hemoglobin and Quick value (area under receiver operating curve: 0.87 for both parameters). Similarly high predictive values were observed for FIBTEM MCF (0.84) and FIBTEM A10 (clot amplitude at 10 minutes; 0.83).FIBTEM A10 and FIBTEM MCF provided similar predictive values for massive transfusion in trauma patients to the most predictive laboratory parameters. Prospective studies are needed to confirm these findings.Initial experiences with point-of-care rapid thrombelastography for management of life-threatening postinjury coagulopathy.Massive transfusion (MTP) protocol design is hindered by lack of accurate assessment of coagulation. Rapid thrombelastography (r-TEG) provides point-of-care (POC) analysis of clot formation. We designed a prospective study to test the hypothesis that integrating TEG into our MTP would facilitate goal-directed therapy and provide equivalent outcomes compared to conventional coagulation testing.Thiry-four patients who received more than 6 units of red blood cells (RBCs)/6 hours who were admitted to our Level 1 trauma center after r-TEG implementation (TEG) were compared to 34 patients admitted prior to TEG implementation (Pre-TEG). Data are presented as mean±SEM.Emergency department pre-TEG versus TEG shock, and coagulation indices, were not different: systolic blood pressure (94 mmHg vs. 101 mmHg), temperature (35.3°C vs. 35.9°C), pH (7.16 vs. 7.11), base deficit (-13.0 vs. -14.7), lactate (6.5 vs. 8.1), international normalized ratio (INR; 1.59 vs. 1.83), and partial thromboplastin time (48.3 vs. 57.9). Although not significant, patients with Injury Severity Score range 26 to 35 were more frequent in the pre-TEG group. Fresh-frozen plasma (FFP):RBCs, platelets:RBCs, and cryoprecipitate (cryo):RBC ratios were not significantly different at 6 or 12 hours. INR at 6 hours did not discriminate between survivors and nonsurvivors (p=0.10), whereas r-TEG "G" value was significantly associated with survival (p=0.03), as was the maximum rate of thrombin generation (MRTG; mm/min) and total thrombin generation (TG; area under the curve) (p=0.03 for both). Patients with MRTG of more than 9.2 received significantly less components of RBCs, FFP, and cryo (p=0.048, p=0.03, and p=0.04, respectively).Goal-directed resuscitation via r-TEG appears useful for management of trauma-induced coagulopathy. Further experience with POC monitoring could result in more efficient management leading to a reduction of transfusion requirements.Coagulation abnormalities in subarachnoid hemorrhage.Fibrinogen levels during trauma hemorrhage, response to replacement therapy, and association with patient outcomes.Low fibrinogen levels are known to occur in trauma. However, the extent of fibrinogen depletion during trauma hemorrhage, the response to replacement therapy and association with patient outcomes remain unclear.The study aims were to: characterize admission fibrinogen level and correlate it with factors associated with injury; describe the time course of fibrinogen depletion and response to replacement therapy; determine the correlation of fibrinogen level with rotational thromboelastography (ROTEM) parameters; evaluate the effect of fibrinogen supplementation ex vivo; and establish the association between fibrinogen level and clinical outcomes.This was a prospective cohort study of 517 patients. Blood samples were drawn on admission and after admistration of every 4 units of packed red blood cells. Fibrinogen levels were determined with the Clauss method, and global hemostatic competence was assessed with thromboelastometry. The effect of fibrinogen supplementation was assessed in a subgroup of coagulopathic patients.Low admission fibrinogen level was independently associated with injury severity score (P < 0.01), shock (P < 0.001), and prehospital fluid volume (P < 0.001). Fibrinogen supplementation during transfusion maintained but did not augment fibrinogen levels. Administration of cryoprecipitate was associated with improved survival. ROTEM parameters correlated with fibrinogen level, and ex vivo fibrinogen administration reversed coagulopathic ROTEM parameters. Fibrinogen level was an independent predictor of mortality at 24 h and 28 days (P < 0.001).Fibrinogen level is decreased in injured patients on admission and is associated with poor outcomes. ROTEM is a rapid means of assessing hypofibrinogenemia. Earlier administration of specific fibrinogen replacement may improve outcomes, and prospective controlled trials are urgently needed.Endothelial glycocalyx degradation induces endogenous heparinization in patients with severe injury and early traumatic coagulopathy.There is emerging evidence that early trauma-induced coagulopathy (TIC) is mechanistically linked to disruption of the vascular endothelium and its glycocalyx, assessed by thrombomodulin and syndecan 1, respectively. This study evaluated if degradation of the endothelial glycocalyx and ensuing release of its heparin-like substances induce autoheparinization and thereby contributes to TIC.Prospective observational study of 77 trauma patients admitted to a Level I trauma center having blood sampled at admission. Data on demography, hematology, Injury Severity Score, transfusion requirements, 30-day mortality, and thrombelastography (TEG, concurrent kaolin-activated/kaolin-heparinase-activated) were recorded. Retrospective analysis of plasma/serum for biomarkers reflecting endothelial glycocalyx and cell damage (syndecan 1, thrombomodulin), tissue injury (histone-complexed DNA fragments), sympathoadrenal activation (adrenaline, noradrenaline), coagulation activation/anticoagulation (prothrombin fragment 1+2, fibrinogen, von Willebrand factor, factor XIII, antithrombin, protein C, activated protein C, tissue factor pathway inhibitor), fibrinolysis (tissue-type plasminogen activator, plasminogen activator inhibitor 1) and inflammation (interleukin 6, terminal complement complex). Stratification of patients was according to the degree of TEG-measured heparinization.Four patients (5.2%) displayed evidence of high-degree autoheparinization, and these patients had higher Injury Severity Score (median [interquartile range], 31 [26-37] vs. 17 [10-26]), increased glucose (median, 13.6 vs. 8.0 mmol/L), and lower hemoglobin level (median, 5.8 vs. 8.4 mmol/L) and received more transfusions during the first 1 hour (median, 5 vs. 0) and 24 hours (median, 10 vs. 0) (all p < 0.05). Importantly, patients with autoheparinization had fourfold higher syndecan 1 levels (median [interquartile range], 116 ng/mL [78-140 ng/mL] vs. 31 ng/mL [18-49 ng/mL]), and they had higher international normalized ratio (median, 1.4 vs. 1.1), thrombomodulin (median, 4.1 vs. 1.7 ng/mL) and interleukin 6 (median, 129 vs. 71 pg/mL) but lower protein C (85% vs. 109%) (all p < 0.05), indicating profound endothelial damage, coagulopathy and inflammation.Five percent of the patients with trauma in the present study had evidence of acute endogenous coagulopathy with autoheparinization by TEG, which appeared mechanistically linked to endothelial glycocalyx degradation. Acute endogenous autoheparinization may contribute to TIC.Prognostic study, level III.Point of care devices for assessing bleeding and coagulation in the trauma patient.Severe trauma is associated with bleeding, coagulopathy, and transfusion of blood and blood products, all contributing to higher rates of morbidity and mortality. The aim of this review is to focus on point-of-care devices to monitor coagulation in trauma. Close monitoring of bleeding and coagulation as well as platelet function in trauma patients allows goal-directed transfusion and an optimization of the patient's coagulation, reduces the exposure to blood products, reduces costs, and probably improves clinical outcome. Noninvasive hemoglobin measurements are not to be used in trauma patients due to a lack in specificity and sensitivity.Hyperfibrinolysis at admission is an uncommon but highly lethal event associated with shock and prehospital fluid administration.Hyperfibrinolysis (HF) has been reported to occur in a range of 2% to 34% of trauma patients. Using rapid thromboelastography (r-TEG), we hypothesized that HF is (1) rarely present at admission on patients with severe injury and (2) associated with crystalloid hemodilution. To further strengthen this hypothesis, we created an in vitro hemodilution model to improve our mechanistic understanding of the early HF.The trauma registry was queried for patients who were our highest-level trauma activations and admitted directly from the scene (October 2009-October 2010). HF was defined as more than 7.5% amplitude reduction 30 minutes after maximal amplitude (LY30). Using r-TEG, we then created an in vitro hemodilution model (0.9% NS) with and without tissue injury (addition of tissue factor and tissue plasminogen activator) to identify crystalloid volumes and injury needed to achieve specific LY30 values.Admission r-TEG values were captured on 1996 consecutive admissions. Only 41 patients (2%) had HF at admission r-TEG. The groups were similar in demographics. Compared with patients without HF, the HF group had more prehospital crystalloid (1.5 vs. 0.5 L), higher median Injury Severity Score (25 vs. 16), greater admission base deficit (20 vs. 2), and higher mortality (76% vs. 10%); all p < 0.001. Controlling for Injury Severity Score and base deficit on arrival, prehospital fluid was associated with a significant increase in likelihood of HF. In fact, each additional liter of crystalloid was associated with a 15% increased odds of HF. The in vitro model found that hemodilution to 15% of baseline and tissue factor + tissue plasminogen activator was required to achieve an LY30 of 50%.Although uncommon immediately after injury, HF is associated with prehospital crystalloid administration and shock at admission and is highly lethal. Our in vitro model confirms that tissue injury and significant crystalloid hemodilution result in severe and immediate HF.Viscoelastic clot strength predicts coagulation-related mortality within 15 minutes.Predicting refractory coagulopathy early in resuscitation of injured patients may decrease a leading cause of preventable death. We hypothesized that clot strength (G) measured by point-of-care rapid thrombelastography (r-TEG) on arrival in the emergency department can predict massive transfusion (MT) and coagulation-related mortality (MT-death).Trauma alerts/activations from May 2008 to September 2010 were reviewed. The variables included the following: age, sex, injury severity score (ISS), systolic blood pressure (SBP), base deficit (BD), traditional coagulation tests (international normalized ratio ([INR], partial thromboplastin time [PTT]), TEG-derived G, and blood products transfused within the first 6 hours. Independent predictors of 2 outcomes (MT [≥10 packed red blood cells units/6 h] and MT-related death) were identified using logistic regression. The individual predictive values of BD, INR, PTT, and G were assessed comparing the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC ROC), while adjusting for age, ISS, and SBP.Among the 80 study patients, 48% required MT, and 21% died of MT-related complications. INR, ISS, and G were independent predictors of MT, whereas age, ISS, SBP, and G were independently associated with MT-death. The predictive power for outcome MT did not differ among INR (adjusted AUC ROC = 0.92), PTT (AUC ROC = 0.90, P = .41), or G (AUC ROC = 0.89, P = .39). For outcome MT-death, G had the greatest adjusted AUC ROC (0.93) compared with the AUC ROC for BD (0.87, P = .05), INR (0.88, P = .11), and PTT (0.89; P = .19).These data suggest that the point-of-care TEG parameter clot strength (G) provides consistent, independent prediction of MT and MT-death early in the resuscitation of injured patients.Can RapidTEG accelerate the search for coagulopathies in the patient with multiple injuries?Early recognition of coagulopathy may improve the care of patients with multiple injuries. Rapid thrombelastography (RapidTEG) is a new variant of thrombelastography (TEG), in which coagulation is initiated by the addition of protein tissue factor. The kinetics of coagulation and the times of measurement were compared for two variants of TEG--RapidTEG and conventional TEG, in which coagulation was initiated with kaolin. The measurements were performed on blood samples from 20 patients with multiple injuries. The RapidTEG results were also compared with conventional measurements of blood coagulation. The mean time for the RapidTEG test was 19.2 +/- 3.1 minutes (mean +/- SD), in comparison with 29.9 +/- 4.3 minutes for kaolin TEG and 34.1 +/- 14.5 minutes for conventional coagulation tests. The mean time for the RapidTEG test was 30.8 +/- 5.72 minutes, in comparison with 41.5 +/- 5.66 minutes for kaolin TEG and 64.9 +/- 18.8 for conventional coagulation tests---measured from admission of the patients to the resuscitation bay until the results were available. There were significant correlations between the RapidTEG results and those from kaolin TEG and conventional coagulation tests. RapidTEG is the most rapid available test for providing reliable information on coagulopathy in patients with multiple injuries. This has implications for improving patient care.Hypercoagulability is most prevalent early after injury and in female patients.Hypercoagulability after injury is a major source of morbidity and mortality. Recent studies indicate that there is a gender-specific risk in trauma patients. This study was performed to determine the course of coagulation after injury and to determine whether there is a gender difference. We hypothesized that hypercoagulability would occur early after injury and that there would be no difference between men and women.This was a prospective cohort study. Inclusion criteria were admission to the intensive care unit, Injury Severity Score > 4, and the ability to obtain consent from the patient or a relative. A Thrombelastograph (TEG) analysis was performed and routine coagulation parameters and thrombin-antithrombin complexes were measured within 24 hours of injury and then daily for 4 days.Sixty-five patients met criteria for entry into the study. Their mean age was 42 +/- 17 years and their mean Injury Severity Score was 23 +/- 12. Forty patients (62%) were men. The prevalence of a hypercoagulable state by TEG was 62% on day 1 and 26% on day 4 (p < 0.01). Women were significantly more hypercoagulable on day 1 than men as measured by the time to onset of clotting (women, 2.9 +/- 0.7 minutes; men, 3.9 +/- 1.5 minutes; p < 0.01; normal, 3.7-8.3 minutes). Mean platelet counts, international normalized ratios, and partial thromboplastin times were within normal limits throughout the study. Thrombin activation as measured by thrombin-antithrombin complexes decreased from 34 +/- 15 microg/L on day 1 to 18 +/- 8 microg/L (p < 0.01) on day 4, consistent with the prevalence of hypercoagulability by TEG.Hypercoagulability after injury is most prevalent during the first 24 hours. Women are more hypercoagulable than men early after injury. The TEG is more sensitive than routine coagulation assays for the detection of a hypercoagulable state.Admission rapid thrombelastography predicts development of pulmonary embolism in trauma patients.Injury leads to dramatic disturbances in coagulation with increased risk of bleeding followed by a hypercoagulable state. A comprehensive assessment of these coagulation abnormalities can be measured and described by thrombelastography. The purpose of this study was to identify whether admission rapid-thrombelastography (r-TEG) could identify patients at risk of developing pulmonary embolism (PE) during their hospital stay.Patients admitted between September 2009 to February 2011 who met criteria for our highest-level trauma activation and were transported directly from the scene were included in the study. PE defined as clinically suspected and computed tomography angiography confirmed PE. We evaluated r-TEG values with particular attention to the maximal amplitude (mA) parameter that is indicative of overall clot strength. Demographics, vital signs, injury severity, and r-TEG values were then evaluated. In addition to r-TEG values, gender and injury severity score (ISS) were chosen a priori for developing a multiple logistic regression model predicting development of PE.r-TEG was obtained on 2,070 consecutive trauma activations. Of these, 2.5% (53) developed PE, 97.5% (2,017) did not develop PE. Patients in the PE group were older (median age, 41 vs. 33 years, p = 0.012) and more likely to be white (69% vs. 54%, p = 0.036). None of the patients in the PE group sustained penetrating injury (0% vs. 25% in the no-PE group, p < 0.001). The PE group also had admission higher mA values (66 vs. 63, p = 0.050) and higher ISS (median, 31 vs. 19, p = 0.002). When controlling for gender, race, age, and ISS, elevated mA at admission was an independent predictor of PE with an odds ratio of 3.5 for mA > 65 and 5.8 for mA > 72.Admission r-TEG mA values can identify patients with an increased risk of in-hospital PE. Further studies are needed to determine whether alternative anticoagulation strategies should be used for these high-risk patients.Prognostic study, level III.Platelet function following trauma. A multiple electrode aggregometry study.Platelets play a central role in coagulation. Currently, information on platelet function following trauma is limited. We performed a retrospective analysis of patients admitted to the emergency room (ER) at the AUVA Trauma Centre, Salzburg, after sustaining traumatic injury. Immediately after admission to the ER, blood was drawn for blood cell counts, standard coagulation tests, and platelet function testing. Platelet function was assessed by multiplate electrode aggregometry (MEA) using adenosine diphosphate (ADPtest), collagen (COLtest) and thrombin receptor activating peptide-6 (TRAPtest) as activators. The thromboelastometric platelet component, measuring the contribution of platelets to the elasticity of the whole-blood clot, was assessed using the ROTEM device. The study included 163 patients, 79.7% were male, and the median age was 43 years. The median injury severity score was 18. Twenty patients (12.3%) died. Median platelet count was significantly lower among non-survivors than survivors (181,000/μl vs. 212,000/μl; p=0.01). Although platelet function defects were relatively minor, significant differences between survivors and non-survivors were observed in the ADPtest (94 vs. 79 U; p=0.0019), TRAPtest (136 vs. 115 U; p<0.0001), and platelet component (134 vs.103 MCEEXTEM - MCEFIBTEM; p=0.0012). Aggregometry values below the normal range for ADPtest and TRAPtest were significantly more frequent in non-survivors than in survivors (p=0.0017 and p=0.0002, respectively). Minor decreases in platelet function upon admission to the ER were a sign of coagulopathy accompanying increased mortality in patients with trauma. Further studies are warranted to confirm these results and investigate the role of platelet function in trauma haemostatic management.Thromboelastography as a better indicator of hypercoagulable state after injury than prothrombin time or activated partial thromboplastin time.To investigate the hemostatic status of critically ill, nonbleeding trauma patients. We hypothesized that a hypercoagulable state exists in patients early after severe injury and that the pattern of clotting and fibrinolysis are similar between burned and nonburn trauma patients.Patients admitted to the surgical or burn intensive care unit within 24 hours after injury were enrolled. Blood samples were drawn on days 0 through 7. Laboratory tests included prothrombin time (PT), activated partial thromboplastin time (aPTT), levels of activated factor XI, D-dimer, protein C percent activity, antithrombin III percent activity, and thromboelastography (TEG).Study subjects were enrolled from April 1, 2004, to May 31, 2005, and included nonburn trauma patients (n = 33), burned patients (n = 25), and healthy (control) subjects (n = 20). Despite aggressive thromboprophylaxis, three subjects (2 burned and 1 nonburn trauma patients [6%]) had pulmonary embolism during hospitalization. Compared with controls, all patients had prolonged PT and aPTT (p < 0.05). The rate of clot formation (alpha angle) and maximal clot strength were higher for patients compared with those of controls (p < 0.05), indicating a hypercoagulable state. Injured patients also had lower protein C and antithrombin III percent activities and higher fibrinogen levels (p < 0.05 for all). Activated factor XI was elevated in 38% of patients (control subjects had undetectable levels).Thromboelastography analysis of whole blood showed that patients were in a hypercoagulable state; this was not detected by plasma PT or aPTT. The high incidence of pulmonary embolism indicated that our current prophylaxis regimen could be improved.Prehospital detection of traumatic coagulopathy.Increased focus on traumatic coagulopathy over the last decade has led to more aggressive use of hemostatic agents in resuscitation of the massively bleeding patient. Novel formulations of plasma factors and other therapeutics have opened for early intervention to prevent coagulopathy and may even be utilized in the prehospital setting. Careful selection of patients to receive hemostatic agents early during the resuscitation is of great importance due to the potential detrimental effects of this treatment. Several studies have identified coagulation parameters as reliable predictors of massive transfusion, even very early after trauma. Prothrombin time international normalized ratio (PT/INR), activated partial thromboplastin time (aPTT), fibrinogen concentration, and viscoelastic tests such as thrombelastography (TEG) and rotational thrombelastometry (RoTEM) have proved to be of value in predicting massive transfusion when performed in-hospital. PT/INR appears to be slightly more accurate than the other parameters, with a reported sensitivity of 84.8% and an area under the receiver operating curve of 0.87. Comparison studies on PT/INR, aPTT, and viscoelastic assays do suggest that caution should be taken when point-of-care (POC) methods, as opposed to conventional laboratory analyses, are used. Novel techniques for POC measurement of fibrinogen levels are currently being developed, and preclinical data suggest acceptable agreement with conventional methods. A number of factors should be considered regarding the feasibility of POC tests in the prehospital environment. In addition to environmental factors such as temperature, altitude, and humidity, electromagnetic interference issues and operators' skills must be taken into account. Coagulation parameters appear to be a useful tool in identifying patients with increased risk of massive bleeding at an early stage. Further studies are needed to determine if prehospital intervention based on POC analyses improves outcome.Evidence based evaluation of immuno-coagulatory interventions in critical care.Cochrane systematic reviews with meta-analyses of randomised trials provide guidance for clinical practice and health-care decision-making. In case of disagreements between research evidence and clinical practice, high quality systematic reviews can facilitate implementation or deimplementation of medical interventions into clinical practice. This applies especially to treatment of critically ill patients where interventions are most often costly and the clinical conditions are associated with high mortality.To assess the potential benefits or harms of 1) antithrombin III (AT III) for critically ill patients; 2) inhaled nitric oxide (INO) for acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS) and acute lung injury (ALI); 3) aerosolized prostacyclin for ARDS and ALI; 4) thrombelastography (TEG) or thromboelastometry (ROTEM) to monitor haemotherapy versus usual care in patients with massive transfusion.We performed four systematic reviews of relevant randomised clinical trials. To quantify the estimated effect of various interventions, we conducted meta-analyses, where appropriate, to determine intervention effects using the Cochrane Collaboration methodology, trial sequential analyses (TSA), the GRADE, and the PRISMA-guidelines when conducting our systematic reviews. All reviews were performed according to published protocols following the recommendations of the Cochrane Handbook for systematic reviews of interventions. We performed multiple subgroup and sensitivity analyses with regard to methodological quality and various clinical outcomes. Trials were identified through Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL), MEDLINE, EMBASE Science Citation Index-Expanded, The Chinese Biomedical Database and LILACS. We included all randomized clinical trials. We hand-searched reference lists, reviews, and contacted authors and experts for additional trials. We searched ClinicalTrials.gov, Centre Watch Clinical Trials Listing Service and ControlledTrials.com for missed, unreported, or ongoing trials. We screened bibliographies of relevant articles and conference proceedings and wrote to trialists and pharmaceutical companies producing the drugs in question.Four systematic reviews included a total of 44 trials with 5,551 patients. Only 15 of the trials were classified as trials with low risk of bias (high methodological quality) regarding generation of the allocation sequence, allocation concealment, blinding, follow-up and other types of bias. 1) Compared with placebo or no intervention, AT III did not significantly affect overall mortality (relative risk (RR) 0.96, 95% confidence interval (CI) 0.89 to 1.03). No subgroup analyses on risk of bias, populations of patients, or with and without adjuvant heparin yielded significant results. AT III significantly increased the risk of bleeding events (RR 1.52, 95% CI 1.30 to 1.78). 2) INO showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (RR 1.06, 95% CI 0.93 to 1.22) and in several subgroup and sensitivity analyses, indicating robust results. Limited data demonstrated no effect of INO on duration of ventilation, ventilator-free days, and length of stay in the intensive care unit and hospital. We found a statistically significant, but transient improvement in oxygenation in the first 24 hours, expressed as the ratio of PO2 to fraction of inspired oxygen (mean difference (MD) 15.91, 95% CI 8.25 to 23.56). However, INO appears to significantly increase the risk of renal impairment among adults (RR 1.59, 95% CI 1.17 to 2.16) but did not significantly affect the risk of bleeding or methaemoglobin or nitrogen dioxide formation. 3) We found only one small low risk of bias paediatric trial examining the role of aerosolized prostacyclin in ALI or ARDS. Based on this limited amount of data, we were unable to support or refute the routine use of this intervention in ALI or ARDS. 4) Compared with standard treatment, TEG or ROTEM showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (RR 0.77, 95% CI 0.35 to 1.72) but only five trials provided data on mortality. Our analyses demonstrated a statistically significant effect of TEG or ROTEM on the amount of bleeding (MD -85.05 ml, 95% CI -140.68 to -29.42) but failed to show any statistically significant effect on other predefined outcomes. However, whether this reduction has implication for the patient's clinical condition is still uncertain.We did not find reliable evidence to support the clinical use of the assessed immuno-coagulatory interventions for general use in critical care based on the available evidence. A large proportion of the trials had serious methodological shortcomings, small number of patients, and short trial duration. The sparse data provided in the included trials may be or may not be promising but is not necessarily evidence of absence of a beneficial or harmful effect, because many of the outcome measures have not been adequately addressed so far. There is an urgent need for several randomised clinical trials with low risk of bias and low risk of random error to evaluate the use of the assessed interventions.TEG-guided resuscitation is superior to standardized MTP resuscitation in massively transfused penetrating trauma patients.For nearly a decade, our center performed thromboelastograms (TEGs) to analyze coagulation profiles, allowing rapid data-driven blood component therapy. After consensus recommendations for massive transfusion protocols (MTPs), we implemented an MTP in October 2009 with 1:1:1 ratio of blood (red blood cells [RBC]), plasma (fresh-frozen plasma [FFP]), and platelets. We hypothesized that TEG-directed resuscitation is equivalent to MTP resuscitation.All patients receiving 6 units (U) or more of RBC in the first 24 hours for 21 months before and after MTP initiation in an urban Level I trauma center were examined. Demographics, mechanism of injury (MOI), Injury Severity Score (ISS), 24-hour volume of RBC, FFP, platelets, crystalloid, and 30-day mortality were compared, excluding patients with traumatic brain injuries. Variables were analyzed using Student's t-test and χ2 or Fisher's exact test.For the preMTP group, there were 165 patients. In the MTP group, there were 124 patients. There were no significant differences in ISS, age, or sex. PreMTP patients with 6U or more RBC had significantly more penetrating MOI (p = 0.017), whereas preMTP patients with 10U or more RBC had similar MOIs. All patients received less crystalloid after MTP adoption (p < 0.001). There was no difference in volume of blood products or mortality in patients receiving 6U or more RBC. Blunt trauma MTP patients who received 10U or more RBC received more FFP (p = 0.02), with no change in mortality. Penetrating trauma patients who received 10U or more RBC received a similar volume of FFP; however, mortality increased from 54.1% for MTP versus 33.3% preMTP (p = 0.04).TEG-directed resuscitation is equivalent to standardized MTP for patients receiving 6U or more RBC and for blunt MOI patients receiving 10U or more RBC. MTP therapy worsened mortality in penetrating MOI patients receiving 10U or more RBC, indicating a continued need for TEG-directed therapy. A 1:1:1 strategy may not be adequate in all patients.Therapeutic study, level IV.Point of care devices for assessing bleeding and coagulation in the trauma patient.Severe trauma is associated with bleeding, coagulopathy, and transfusion of blood and blood products, all contributing to higher rates of morbidity and mortality. The aim of this review is to focus on point-of-care devices to monitor coagulation in trauma. Close monitoring of bleeding and coagulation as well as platelet function in trauma patients allows goal-directed transfusion and an optimization of the patient's coagulation, reduces the exposure to blood products, reduces costs, and probably improves clinical outcome. Noninvasive hemoglobin measurements are not to be used in trauma patients due to a lack in specificity and sensitivity.Prehospital detection of traumatic coagulopathy.Increased focus on traumatic coagulopathy over the last decade has led to more aggressive use of hemostatic agents in resuscitation of the massively bleeding patient. Novel formulations of plasma factors and other therapeutics have opened for early intervention to prevent coagulopathy and may even be utilized in the prehospital setting. Careful selection of patients to receive hemostatic agents early during the resuscitation is of great importance due to the potential detrimental effects of this treatment. Several studies have identified coagulation parameters as reliable predictors of massive transfusion, even very early after trauma. Prothrombin time international normalized ratio (PT/INR), activated partial thromboplastin time (aPTT), fibrinogen concentration, and viscoelastic tests such as thrombelastography (TEG) and rotational thrombelastometry (RoTEM) have proved to be of value in predicting massive transfusion when performed in-hospital. PT/INR appears to be slightly more accurate than the other parameters, with a reported sensitivity of 84.8% and an area under the receiver operating curve of 0.87. Comparison studies on PT/INR, aPTT, and viscoelastic assays do suggest that caution should be taken when point-of-care (POC) methods, as opposed to conventional laboratory analyses, are used. Novel techniques for POC measurement of fibrinogen levels are currently being developed, and preclinical data suggest acceptable agreement with conventional methods. A number of factors should be considered regarding the feasibility of POC tests in the prehospital environment. In addition to environmental factors such as temperature, altitude, and humidity, electromagnetic interference issues and operators' skills must be taken into account. Coagulation parameters appear to be a useful tool in identifying patients with increased risk of massive bleeding at an early stage. Further studies are needed to determine if prehospital intervention based on POC analyses improves outcome.The incidence and magnitude of fibrinolytic activation in trauma patients.Trauma is a global disease, with over 2.5 million deaths annually from hemorrhage and coagulopathy. Overt hyperfibrinolysis is rare in trauma, and is associated with massive fatal injuries. Paradoxically, clinical trials suggest a much broader indication for antifibrinolytics.To determine the incidence and magnitude of fibrinolytic activation in trauma patients and its relationship to clot lysis as measured by thromboelastometry.A prospective cohort study of 303 consecutive trauma patients admitted between January 2007 and June 2009 was performed. Blood was drawn on arrival for thromboelastometry (TEM) and coagulation assays. Follow-up was until hospital discharge or death. TEM hyperfibrinolysis was defined as maximum clot lysis of > 15%. Fibrinolytic activation (FA) was determined according to plasmin-antiplasmin (PAP) complex and D-dimer levels. Data were collected on demographics, mechanism, severity of injury, and baseline vital signs. The primary outcome measure was 28-day mortality. The secondary outcome measures were 28-day ventilator-free days and 24-h transfusion requirement.Only 5% of patients had severe fibrinolysis on TEM, but 57% of patients had evidence of 'moderate' fibrinolysis, with PAP complex levels elevated to over twice normal (> 1500 μg L(-1)) without lysis on TEM. TEM detected clot lysis only when PAP complex levels were increased to 30 times normal (P < 0.001) and antiplasmin levels were < 75% of normal. Patients with FA had increased 28-day mortality as compared with those with no FA (12% vs. 1%, P < 0.001), fewer ventilator-free days, and longer hospital stay.FA occurs in the majority of trauma patients, and the magnitude of FA correlates with poor clinical outcome. This was not detected by conventional TEM, which is an insensitive measure of endogenous fibrinolytic activity.Rotational thromboelastometry (ROTEM)-based coagulation management in cardiac surgery and major trauma.Hyperfibrinolysis at admission is an uncommon but highly lethal event associated with shock and prehospital fluid administration.Hyperfibrinolysis (HF) has been reported to occur in a range of 2% to 34% of trauma patients. Using rapid thromboelastography (r-TEG), we hypothesized that HF is (1) rarely present at admission on patients with severe injury and (2) associated with crystalloid hemodilution. To further strengthen this hypothesis, we created an in vitro hemodilution model to improve our mechanistic understanding of the early HF.The trauma registry was queried for patients who were our highest-level trauma activations and admitted directly from the scene (October 2009-October 2010). HF was defined as more than 7.5% amplitude reduction 30 minutes after maximal amplitude (LY30). Using r-TEG, we then created an in vitro hemodilution model (0.9% NS) with and without tissue injury (addition of tissue factor and tissue plasminogen activator) to identify crystalloid volumes and injury needed to achieve specific LY30 values.Admission r-TEG values were captured on 1996 consecutive admissions. Only 41 patients (2%) had HF at admission r-TEG. The groups were similar in demographics. Compared with patients without HF, the HF group had more prehospital crystalloid (1.5 vs. 0.5 L), higher median Injury Severity Score (25 vs. 16), greater admission base deficit (20 vs. 2), and higher mortality (76% vs. 10%); all p < 0.001. Controlling for Injury Severity Score and base deficit on arrival, prehospital fluid was associated with a significant increase in likelihood of HF. In fact, each additional liter of crystalloid was associated with a 15% increased odds of HF. The in vitro model found that hemodilution to 15% of baseline and tissue factor + tissue plasminogen activator was required to achieve an LY30 of 50%.Although uncommon immediately after injury, HF is associated with prehospital crystalloid administration and shock at admission and is highly lethal. Our in vitro model confirms that tissue injury and significant crystalloid hemodilution result in severe and immediate HF.Endothelial glycocalyx degradation induces endogenous heparinization in patients with severe injury and early traumatic coagulopathy.There is emerging evidence that early trauma-induced coagulopathy (TIC) is mechanistically linked to disruption of the vascular endothelium and its glycocalyx, assessed by thrombomodulin and syndecan 1, respectively. This study evaluated if degradation of the endothelial glycocalyx and ensuing release of its heparin-like substances induce autoheparinization and thereby contributes to TIC.Prospective observational study of 77 trauma patients admitted to a Level I trauma center having blood sampled at admission. Data on demography, hematology, Injury Severity Score, transfusion requirements, 30-day mortality, and thrombelastography (TEG, concurrent kaolin-activated/kaolin-heparinase-activated) were recorded. Retrospective analysis of plasma/serum for biomarkers reflecting endothelial glycocalyx and cell damage (syndecan 1, thrombomodulin), tissue injury (histone-complexed DNA fragments), sympathoadrenal activation (adrenaline, noradrenaline), coagulation activation/anticoagulation (prothrombin fragment 1+2, fibrinogen, von Willebrand factor, factor XIII, antithrombin, protein C, activated protein C, tissue factor pathway inhibitor), fibrinolysis (tissue-type plasminogen activator, plasminogen activator inhibitor 1) and inflammation (interleukin 6, terminal complement complex). Stratification of patients was according to the degree of TEG-measured heparinization.Four patients (5.2%) displayed evidence of high-degree autoheparinization, and these patients had higher Injury Severity Score (median [interquartile range], 31 [26-37] vs. 17 [10-26]), increased glucose (median, 13.6 vs. 8.0 mmol/L), and lower hemoglobin level (median, 5.8 vs. 8.4 mmol/L) and received more transfusions during the first 1 hour (median, 5 vs. 0) and 24 hours (median, 10 vs. 0) (all p < 0.05). Importantly, patients with autoheparinization had fourfold higher syndecan 1 levels (median [interquartile range], 116 ng/mL [78-140 ng/mL] vs. 31 ng/mL [18-49 ng/mL]), and they had higher international normalized ratio (median, 1.4 vs. 1.1), thrombomodulin (median, 4.1 vs. 1.7 ng/mL) and interleukin 6 (median, 129 vs. 71 pg/mL) but lower protein C (85% vs. 109%) (all p < 0.05), indicating profound endothelial damage, coagulopathy and inflammation.Five percent of the patients with trauma in the present study had evidence of acute endogenous coagulopathy with autoheparinization by TEG, which appeared mechanistically linked to endothelial glycocalyx degradation. Acute endogenous autoheparinization may contribute to TIC.Prognostic study, level III.Admission rapid thrombelastography predicts development of pulmonary embolism in trauma patients.Injury leads to dramatic disturbances in coagulation with increased risk of bleeding followed by a hypercoagulable state. A comprehensive assessment of these coagulation abnormalities can be measured and described by thrombelastography. The purpose of this study was to identify whether admission rapid-thrombelastography (r-TEG) could identify patients at risk of developing pulmonary embolism (PE) during their hospital stay.Patients admitted between September 2009 to February 2011 who met criteria for our highest-level trauma activation and were transported directly from the scene were included in the study. PE defined as clinically suspected and computed tomography angiography confirmed PE. We evaluated r-TEG values with particular attention to the maximal amplitude (mA) parameter that is indicative of overall clot strength. Demographics, vital signs, injury severity, and r-TEG values were then evaluated. In addition to r-TEG values, gender and injury severity score (ISS) were chosen a priori for developing a multiple logistic regression model predicting development of PE.r-TEG was obtained on 2,070 consecutive trauma activations. Of these, 2.5% (53) developed PE, 97.5% (2,017) did not develop PE. Patients in the PE group were older (median age, 41 vs. 33 years, p = 0.012) and more likely to be white (69% vs. 54%, p = 0.036). None of the patients in the PE group sustained penetrating injury (0% vs. 25% in the no-PE group, p < 0.001). The PE group also had admission higher mA values (66 vs. 63, p = 0.050) and higher ISS (median, 31 vs. 19, p = 0.002). When controlling for gender, race, age, and ISS, elevated mA at admission was an independent predictor of PE with an odds ratio of 3.5 for mA > 65 and 5.8 for mA > 72.Admission r-TEG mA values can identify patients with an increased risk of in-hospital PE. Further studies are needed to determine whether alternative anticoagulation strategies should be used for these high-risk patients.Prognostic study, level III.The Rapid TEG α-Angle may be a sensitive predictor of transfusion in moderately injured blunt trauma patients.To guide the administration of blood products, coagulation screening of trauma patients should be fast and accurate. The purpose of this study was to identify the correlation between CCT and TEG in trauma, to determine which CCT or TEG parameter is most sensitive in predicting transfusion in trauma, and to define TEG cut-off points for trauma care.A six-month, prospective observational study of 76 adult patients with suspected multiple injuries was conducted at a Level 1 trauma centre of a university hospital. Physicians blinded to TEG results made the decision to transfuse based on clinical evaluation.The study results showed that conventional coagulation tests correlate moderately with Rapid TEG parameters (R: 0.44-0.61). Kaolin and Rapid TEG were more sensitive than CCTs, and the Rapid TEG α-Angle was identified as the single parameter with the greatest sensitivity (84%) and validity (77%) at a cut-off of 74.7 degrees. When the Rapid TEG α-Angle was combined with heart rate >75 bpm, or haematocrit < 41%, sensitivity (84%, 88%) and specificity (75%, 73%) were improved.Cutoff points for transfusion can be determined with the Rapid TEG α-Angle and can provide better sensitivity than CCTs, but a larger study population is needed to reproduce this finding.Fibrinogen levels during trauma hemorrhage, response to replacement therapy, and association with patient outcomes.Low fibrinogen levels are known to occur in trauma. However, the extent of fibrinogen depletion during trauma hemorrhage, the response to replacement therapy and association with patient outcomes remain unclear.The study aims were to: characterize admission fibrinogen level and correlate it with factors associated with injury; describe the time course of fibrinogen depletion and response to replacement therapy; determine the correlation of fibrinogen level with rotational thromboelastography (ROTEM) parameters; evaluate the effect of fibrinogen supplementation ex vivo; and establish the association between fibrinogen level and clinical outcomes.This was a prospective cohort study of 517 patients. Blood samples were drawn on admission and after admistration of every 4 units of packed red blood cells. Fibrinogen levels were determined with the Clauss method, and global hemostatic competence was assessed with thromboelastometry. The effect of fibrinogen supplementation was assessed in a subgroup of coagulopathic patients.Low admission fibrinogen level was independently associated with injury severity score (P < 0.01), shock (P < 0.001), and prehospital fluid volume (P < 0.001). Fibrinogen supplementation during transfusion maintained but did not augment fibrinogen levels. Administration of cryoprecipitate was associated with improved survival. ROTEM parameters correlated with fibrinogen level, and ex vivo fibrinogen administration reversed coagulopathic ROTEM parameters. Fibrinogen level was an independent predictor of mortality at 24 h and 28 days (P < 0.001).Fibrinogen level is decreased in injured patients on admission and is associated with poor outcomes. ROTEM is a rapid means of assessing hypofibrinogenemia. Earlier administration of specific fibrinogen replacement may improve outcomes, and prospective controlled trials are urgently needed.Viscoelastic clot strength predicts coagulation-related mortality within 15 minutes.Predicting refractory coagulopathy early in resuscitation of injured patients may decrease a leading cause of preventable death. We hypothesized that clot strength (G) measured by point-of-care rapid thrombelastography (r-TEG) on arrival in the emergency department can predict massive transfusion (MT) and coagulation-related mortality (MT-death).Trauma alerts/activations from May 2008 to September 2010 were reviewed. The variables included the following: age, sex, injury severity score (ISS), systolic blood pressure (SBP), base deficit (BD), traditional coagulation tests (international normalized ratio ([INR], partial thromboplastin time [PTT]), TEG-derived G, and blood products transfused within the first 6 hours. Independent predictors of 2 outcomes (MT [≥10 packed red blood cells units/6 h] and MT-related death) were identified using logistic regression. The individual predictive values of BD, INR, PTT, and G were assessed comparing the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC ROC), while adjusting for age, ISS, and SBP.Among the 80 study patients, 48% required MT, and 21% died of MT-related complications. INR, ISS, and G were independent predictors of MT, whereas age, ISS, SBP, and G were independently associated with MT-death. The predictive power for outcome MT did not differ among INR (adjusted AUC ROC = 0.92), PTT (AUC ROC = 0.90, P = .41), or G (AUC ROC = 0.89, P = .39). For outcome MT-death, G had the greatest adjusted AUC ROC (0.93) compared with the AUC ROC for BD (0.87, P = .05), INR (0.88, P = .11), and PTT (0.89; P = .19).These data suggest that the point-of-care TEG parameter clot strength (G) provides consistent, independent prediction of MT and MT-death early in the resuscitation of injured patients.Initial experiences with point-of-care rapid thrombelastography for management of life-threatening postinjury coagulopathy.Massive transfusion (MTP) protocol design is hindered by lack of accurate assessment of coagulation. Rapid thrombelastography (r-TEG) provides point-of-care (POC) analysis of clot formation. We designed a prospective study to test the hypothesis that integrating TEG into our MTP would facilitate goal-directed therapy and provide equivalent outcomes compared to conventional coagulation testing.Thiry-four patients who received more than 6 units of red blood cells (RBCs)/6 hours who were admitted to our Level 1 trauma center after r-TEG implementation (TEG) were compared to 34 patients admitted prior to TEG implementation (Pre-TEG). Data are presented as mean±SEM.Emergency department pre-TEG versus TEG shock, and coagulation indices, were not different: systolic blood pressure (94 mmHg vs. 101 mmHg), temperature (35.3°C vs. 35.9°C), pH (7.16 vs. 7.11), base deficit (-13.0 vs. -14.7), lactate (6.5 vs. 8.1), international normalized ratio (INR; 1.59 vs. 1.83), and partial thromboplastin time (48.3 vs. 57.9). Although not significant, patients with Injury Severity Score range 26 to 35 were more frequent in the pre-TEG group. Fresh-frozen plasma (FFP):RBCs, platelets:RBCs, and cryoprecipitate (cryo):RBC ratios were not significantly different at 6 or 12 hours. INR at 6 hours did not discriminate between survivors and nonsurvivors (p=0.10), whereas r-TEG "G" value was significantly associated with survival (p=0.03), as was the maximum rate of thrombin generation (MRTG; mm/min) and total thrombin generation (TG; area under the curve) (p=0.03 for both). Patients with MRTG of more than 9.2 received significantly less components of RBCs, FFP, and cryo (p=0.048, p=0.03, and p=0.04, respectively).Goal-directed resuscitation via r-TEG appears useful for management of trauma-induced coagulopathy. Further experience with POC monitoring could result in more efficient management leading to a reduction of transfusion requirements.FIBTEM provides early prediction of massive transfusion in trauma.Prediction of massive transfusion (MT) among trauma patients is difficult in the early phase of trauma management. Whole-blood thromboelastometry (ROTEM®) tests provide immediate information about the coagulation status of acute bleeding trauma patients. We investigated their value for early prediction of MT.This retrospective study included patients admitted to the AUVA Trauma Centre, Salzburg, Austria, with an injury severity score ≥16, from whom blood samples were taken immediately upon admission to the emergency room (ER). ROTEM® analyses (extrinsically-activated test with tissue factor (EXTEM), intrinsically-activated test using ellagic acid (INTEM) and fibrin-based extrinsically activated test with tissue factor and the platelet inhibitor cytochalasin D (FIBTEM) tests) were performed. We divided patients into two groups: massive transfusion (MT, those who received ≥10 units red blood cell concentrate within 24 hours of admission) and non-MT (those who received 0 to 9 units).Of 323 patients included in this study (78.9% male; median age 44 years), 78 were included in the MT group and 245 in the non-MT group. The median injury severity score upon admission to the ER was significantly higher in the MT group than in the non-MT group (42 vs 27, P < 0.0001). EXTEM and INTEM clotting time and clot formation time were significantly prolonged and maximum clot firmness (MCF) was significantly lower in the MT group versus the non-MT group (P < 0.0001 for all comparisons). Of patients admitted with FIBTEM MCF 0 to 3 mm, 85% received MT. The best predictive values for MT were provided by hemoglobin and Quick value (area under receiver operating curve: 0.87 for both parameters). Similarly high predictive values were observed for FIBTEM MCF (0.84) and FIBTEM A10 (clot amplitude at 10 minutes; 0.83).FIBTEM A10 and FIBTEM MCF provided similar predictive values for massive transfusion in trauma patients to the most predictive laboratory parameters. Prospective studies are needed to confirm these findings.Hyperfibrinolysis diagnosed by rotational thromboelastometry (ROTEM) is associated with higher mortality in patients with severe trauma.We investigated whether hyperfibrinolysis and its severity was associated with outcome of traumatized and nontraumatized patients.From April 2008 to April 2010, all emergency patients with hyperfibrinolysis were enrolled in this study. Hyperfibrinolysis patients were divided into traumatized (trauma hyperfibrinolysis group) and nontraumatized (nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group). The trauma hyperfibrinolysis group was matched with 24 polytrauma patients without hyperfibrinolysis (matched trauma group). Data from rotational thromboelastometry measurements, blood gas analysis (metabolic state), laboratory analysis, injury severity score, and 30-day mortality were collected.Thirty-five patients with hyperfibrinolysis were identified (13 traumatized, 22 nontraumatized). Overall mortality for hyperfibrinolysis was 54%. Mortality in the trauma hyperfibrinolysis group (77%±12%) was significantly higher than in the nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group (41%±10%; P=0.001, 95% CI 5%-67%) and the matched trauma group (33%±10%; P=0.009, 95% CI 13%-74%). Hyperfibrinolysis is significantly (P=0.017) associated with mortality in trauma patients. In the blood gas analysis representing the metabolic state, only pH (P=0.02) and potassium (P=0.01) were significantly lower in the trauma hyperfibrinolysis group compared to the nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group.Mortality from hyperfibrinolysis is significantly higher in trauma compared with nontrauma patients, and hyperfibrinolysis is an independent factor predicting mortality in trauma patients. Rotational thromboelastometry provides real-time recognition of hyperfibrinolysis allowing early treatment.Evidence based evaluation of immuno-coagulatory interventions in critical care.Cochrane systematic reviews with meta-analyses of randomised trials provide guidance for clinical practice and health-care decision-making. In case of disagreements between research evidence and clinical practice, high quality systematic reviews can facilitate implementation or deimplementation of medical interventions into clinical practice. This applies especially to treatment of critically ill patients where interventions are most often costly and the clinical conditions are associated with high mortality.To assess the potential benefits or harms of 1) antithrombin III (AT III) for critically ill patients; 2) inhaled nitric oxide (INO) for acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS) and acute lung injury (ALI); 3) aerosolized prostacyclin for ARDS and ALI; 4) thrombelastography (TEG) or thromboelastometry (ROTEM) to monitor haemotherapy versus usual care in patients with massive transfusion.We performed four systematic reviews of relevant randomised clinical trials. To quantify the estimated effect of various interventions, we conducted meta-analyses, where appropriate, to determine intervention effects using the Cochrane Collaboration methodology, trial sequential analyses (TSA), the GRADE, and the PRISMA-guidelines when conducting our systematic reviews. All reviews were performed according to published protocols following the recommendations of the Cochrane Handbook for systematic reviews of interventions. We performed multiple subgroup and sensitivity analyses with regard to methodological quality and various clinical outcomes. Trials were identified through Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL), MEDLINE, EMBASE Science Citation Index-Expanded, The Chinese Biomedical Database and LILACS. We included all randomized clinical trials. We hand-searched reference lists, reviews, and contacted authors and experts for additional trials. We searched ClinicalTrials.gov, Centre Watch Clinical Trials Listing Service and ControlledTrials.com for missed, unreported, or ongoing trials. We screened bibliographies of relevant articles and conference proceedings and wrote to trialists and pharmaceutical companies producing the drugs in question.Four systematic reviews included a total of 44 trials with 5,551 patients. Only 15 of the trials were classified as trials with low risk of bias (high methodological quality) regarding generation of the allocation sequence, allocation concealment, blinding, follow-up and other types of bias. 1) Compared with placebo or no intervention, AT III did not significantly affect overall mortality (relative risk (RR) 0.96, 95% confidence interval (CI) 0.89 to 1.03). No subgroup analyses on risk of bias, populations of patients, or with and without adjuvant heparin yielded significant results. AT III significantly increased the risk of bleeding events (RR 1.52, 95% CI 1.30 to 1.78). 2) INO showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (RR 1.06, 95% CI 0.93 to 1.22) and in several subgroup and sensitivity analyses, indicating robust results. Limited data demonstrated no effect of INO on duration of ventilation, ventilator-free days, and length of stay in the intensive care unit and hospital. We found a statistically significant, but transient improvement in oxygenation in the first 24 hours, expressed as the ratio of PO2 to fraction of inspired oxygen (mean difference (MD) 15.91, 95% CI 8.25 to 23.56). However, INO appears to significantly increase the risk of renal impairment among adults (RR 1.59, 95% CI 1.17 to 2.16) but did not significantly affect the risk of bleeding or methaemoglobin or nitrogen dioxide formation. 3) We found only one small low risk of bias paediatric trial examining the role of aerosolized prostacyclin in ALI or ARDS. Based on this limited amount of data, we were unable to support or refute the routine use of this intervention in ALI or ARDS. 4) Compared with standard treatment, TEG or ROTEM showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (RR 0.77, 95% CI 0.35 to 1.72) but only five trials provided data on mortality. Our analyses demonstrated a statistically significant effect of TEG or ROTEM on the amount of bleeding (MD -85.05 ml, 95% CI -140.68 to -29.42) but failed to show any statistically significant effect on other predefined outcomes. However, whether this reduction has implication for the patient's clinical condition is still uncertain.We did not find reliable evidence to support the clinical use of the assessed immuno-coagulatory interventions for general use in critical care based on the available evidence. A large proportion of the trials had serious methodological shortcomings, small number of patients, and short trial duration. The sparse data provided in the included trials may be or may not be promising but is not necessarily evidence of absence of a beneficial or harmful effect, because many of the outcome measures have not been adequately addressed so far. There is an urgent need for several randomised clinical trials with low risk of bias and low risk of random error to evaluate the use of the assessed interventions.Functional definition and characterization of acute traumatic coagulopathy.To identify an appropriate diagnostic tool for the early diagnosis of acute traumatic coagulopathy and validate this modality through prediction of transfusion requirements in trauma hemorrhage.Prospective observational cohort study.Level 1 trauma center.Adult trauma patients who met the local criteria for full trauma team activation. Exclusion criteria included emergency department arrival >2 hrs after injury, >2000 mL of intravenous fluid before emergency department arrival, or transfer from another hospital.None.Blood was collected on arrival in the emergency department and analyzed with laboratory prothrombin time, point-of-care prothrombin time, and rotational thromboelastometry. Prothrombin time ratio was calculated and acute traumatic coagulopathy defined as laboratory prothrombin time ratio >1.2. Transfusion requirements were recorded for the first 12 hrs following admission.Three hundred patients were included in the study. Laboratory prothrombin time results were available at a median of 78 (62-103) mins. Point-of-care prothrombin time ratio had reduced agreement with laboratory prothrombin time ratio in patients with acute traumatic coagulopathy, with 29% false-negative results. In acute traumatic coagulopathy, the rotational thromboelastometry clot amplitude at 5 mins was diminished by 42%, and this persisted throughout clot maturation. Rotational thromboelastometry clotting time was not significantly prolonged. Clot amplitude at a 5-min threshold of ≤35 mm had a detection rate of 77% for acute traumatic coagulopathy with a false-positive rate of 13%. Patients with clot amplitude at 5 mins ≤35 mm were more likely to receive red cell (46% vs. 17%, p < .001) and plasma (37% vs. 11%, p < .001) transfusions. The clot amplitude at 5 mins could identify patients who would require massive transfusion (detection rate of 71%, vs. 43% for prothrombin time ratio >1.2, p < .001).In trauma hemorrhage, prothrombin time ratio is not rapidly available from the laboratory and point-of-care devices can be inaccurate. Acute traumatic coagulopathy is functionally characterized by a reduction in clot strength. With a threshold of clot amplitude at 5 mins of ≤35 mm, rotational thromboelastometry can identify acute traumatic coagulopathy at 5 mins and predict the need for massive transfusion.Platelet function following trauma. A multiple electrode aggregometry study.Platelets play a central role in coagulation. Currently, information on platelet function following trauma is limited. We performed a retrospective analysis of patients admitted to the emergency room (ER) at the AUVA Trauma Centre, Salzburg, after sustaining traumatic injury. Immediately after admission to the ER, blood was drawn for blood cell counts, standard coagulation tests, and platelet function testing. Platelet function was assessed by multiplate electrode aggregometry (MEA) using adenosine diphosphate (ADPtest), collagen (COLtest) and thrombin receptor activating peptide-6 (TRAPtest) as activators. The thromboelastometric platelet component, measuring the contribution of platelets to the elasticity of the whole-blood clot, was assessed using the ROTEM device. The study included 163 patients, 79.7% were male, and the median age was 43 years. The median injury severity score was 18. Twenty patients (12.3%) died. Median platelet count was significantly lower among non-survivors than survivors (181,000/μl vs. 212,000/μl; p=0.01). Although platelet function defects were relatively minor, significant differences between survivors and non-survivors were observed in the ADPtest (94 vs. 79 U; p=0.0019), TRAPtest (136 vs. 115 U; p<0.0001), and platelet component (134 vs.103 MCEEXTEM - MCEFIBTEM; p=0.0012). Aggregometry values below the normal range for ADPtest and TRAPtest were significantly more frequent in non-survivors than in survivors (p=0.0017 and p=0.0002, respectively). Minor decreases in platelet function upon admission to the ER were a sign of coagulopathy accompanying increased mortality in patients with trauma. Further studies are warranted to confirm these results and investigate the role of platelet function in trauma haemostatic management.The prognostic value of thrombelastography in identifying neurosurgical patients with worse prognosis.Coagulopathy in patients with intracranial haemorrhage or traumatic brain injury (TBI) is associated with clinical deterioration and worse outcome. Whole blood viscoelastic haemostatic assays, like thrombelastography (TEG), might aid conventional coagulation assays in identification of patients with worse prognosis. We performed a review of patients (totalling 78 patients) with primary acute intracranial haemorrhage or isolated TBI admitted to a neurointensive care unit (NICU) for more than 24 h during a period of 9 months, who had TEG analysis performed at admission. Primary outcome was all-cause 30-day mortality, whereas decline in Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) score at 24 h after admission or death due to cerebral incarceration were secondary outcomes. Patients were defined as hypocoaguable if TEG reaction time was more than 8 min, angle less than 55° and/or maximal amplitude less than 51 mm. Patients were defined hypocoaguable according to conventional coagulation assays if international normalized ratio was more than 1.3, platelet counts less than 100×10/l and/or activated partial thromboplastine time more than 35 s. Eight patients were hypocoaguable by TEG on admission to NICU and had higher 30-day mortality (63% vs. 16%, P=0.008), more often declined in GCS (57% vs. 16%, P=0.02) and expired due to cerebral incarceration (50% vs. 6%, P=0.02). Hypocoagulability by TEG, lower admission GCS and subarachnoid haemorrhage were independently associated with higher 30-day mortality [TEG: odds ratio (OR) 14.8 (2.2-100.1), P=0.006; GCS: OR 1.3 (1.1-1.5), P=0.006; subarachnoid haemorrhage: OR: 5.3 (1.3-22.3), P=0.02]. Only two patients were hypocoaguable by both conventional coagulation assays and TEG. The current data indicate that hypocoagulability by TEG at admission to NICU predicts worse prognosis. Low concordance with conventional coagulation assays indicates that TEG might be valuable in identifying patients with clinically relevant coagulopathy.Thrombelastography (TEG) or thromboelastometry (ROTEM) to monitor haemotherapy versus usual care in patients with massive transfusion.Severe bleeding and coagulopathy as a result of massive transfusion are serious clinical conditions that are associated with high mortality. Thromboelastography (TEG) and thromboelastometry (ROTEM) are increasingly used to guide transfusion strategy but their roles remain disputed.To systematically assess the benefits and harms of a TEG or ROTEM guided transfusion strategy in randomized trials involving patients with severe bleeding.Randomized clinical trials (RCTs) were identified from electronic databases: Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL) (The Cochrane Library 2010, Issue 9); MEDLINE; EMBASE; Science Citation Index Expanded; International Web of Science; CINAHL; LILACS; and the Chinese Biomedical Literature Database (up to 31st October 2010). We contacted trial authors, authors of previous reviews, and manufacturers in the field.We included all RCTs, irrespective of blinding or language, that compared transfusion guided by TEG or ROTEM to transfusion guided by clinical judgement and standard laboratory tests, or both.Two authors independently abstracted data; they resolved any disagreements by discussion. We presented pooled estimates of the intervention effects on dichotomous outcomes as relative risks (RR) and on continuous outcomes as mean differences, with 95% confidence intervals (CI). Our primary outcome measure was all cause mortality. We performed subgroup and sensitivity analyses to assess the effect of TEG or ROTEM in adults and children on various clinical and physiological outcomes. We assessed the risk of bias through assessment of trial methodological components and the risk of random error through trial sequential analysis.We included nine RCTs with a total of 776 participants; only one trial had a low risk of bias. We found two ongoing trials but were unable to retrieve any data from them. Compared with standard treatment, TEG or ROTEM showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (3.78% versus 5.11%, RR 0.77, 95% CI 0.35 to 1.72; I(2) = 0%) but only five trials provided data on mortality. Our analyses demonstrated a statistically significant effect of TEG or ROTEM on the amount of bleeding (MD -85.05 ml, 95% CI -140.68 to -29.42; I(2) = 26%) but failed to show any statistically significant effect on other predefined outcomes.There is an absence of evidence that TEG or ROTEM improves morbidity or mortality in patients with severe bleeding. Application of a TEG or ROTEM guided transfusion strategy seems to reduce the amount of bleeding but whether this has implications for the clinical condition of patients is still uncertain. More research is needed.A novel thromboelastographic score to identify overt disseminated intravascular coagulation resulting in a hypocoagulable state.Thromboelastography (TEM) yields a multitude of data that are complicated to analyze. We evaluated its value in identification of global coagulopathy in overt disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC). We studied 21 patients, each with International Society for Haemostasis and Thrombosis scores of 5 or more (compatible with overt DIC) and less than 5 (suggestive of nonovert DIC), who underwent whole blood nonadditive TEM. A TEM score based on the reaction and kappa times, alpha angle, and maximum amplitude was defined as the total number of TEM parameters deranged in the direction of hypocoagulability. The TEM score at a cutoff of 2 or more achieved sensitivity of 95.2%, specificity of 81.0%, and the highest receiver operating characteristic area under the curve of all parameters of 0.957 for identifying overt DIC. Individual TEM parameters correlated variably with conventional tests. Their combination into a cohesive TEM score possibly better captured the multiple hemostatic derangements occurring in DIC. The TEM score may bring objectivity to the analysis of TEM data.Splenectomy leads to a persistent hypercoagulable state after trauma.It was hypothesized that splenectomy following trauma results in hypercoagulability.A prospective, nonrandomized, single-center study was performed to evaluate coagulation parameters in trauma patients with splenic injury.Patients with splenectomy (n = 30) and nonoperative management (n = 50) were enrolled. Splenectomy patients were older, had higher Injury Severity Scores, and had longer intensive care unit and hospital stays (P < .05). Splenectomy patients had significantly increased white blood cell counts and platelet counts at baseline and follow-up (P < .01). Fibrinogen was initially elevated in both groups and remained elevated in the splenectomy group (P < .05). Tissue plasminogen activator, plasminogen activator inhibitor-1, and activated partial thromboplastin time were higher in splenectomy patients only at baseline (P < .05). Baseline thromboelastography showed faster fibrin cross-linking and enhanced fibrinolysis following splenectomy (P < .05). Only clot strength was greater at follow-up in the splenectomy group (P < .01). Deep venous thrombosis developed in 7% of splenectomy patients and no control patients (P = .03).A significant difference in deep venous thrombosis formation was noted, and coagulation assays indicated persistent hypercoagulability following splenectomy for trauma.Thromboelastography as a better indicator of hypercoagulable state after injury than prothrombin time or activated partial thromboplastin time.To investigate the hemostatic status of critically ill, nonbleeding trauma patients. We hypothesized that a hypercoagulable state exists in patients early after severe injury and that the pattern of clotting and fibrinolysis are similar between burned and nonburn trauma patients.Patients admitted to the surgical or burn intensive care unit within 24 hours after injury were enrolled. Blood samples were drawn on days 0 through 7. Laboratory tests included prothrombin time (PT), activated partial thromboplastin time (aPTT), levels of activated factor XI, D-dimer, protein C percent activity, antithrombin III percent activity, and thromboelastography (TEG).Study subjects were enrolled from April 1, 2004, to May 31, 2005, and included nonburn trauma patients (n = 33), burned patients (n = 25), and healthy (control) subjects (n = 20). Despite aggressive thromboprophylaxis, three subjects (2 burned and 1 nonburn trauma patients [6%]) had pulmonary embolism during hospitalization. Compared with controls, all patients had prolonged PT and aPTT (p < 0.05). The rate of clot formation (alpha angle) and maximal clot strength were higher for patients compared with those of controls (p < 0.05), indicating a hypercoagulable state. Injured patients also had lower protein C and antithrombin III percent activities and higher fibrinogen levels (p < 0.05 for all). Activated factor XI was elevated in 38% of patients (control subjects had undetectable levels).Thromboelastography analysis of whole blood showed that patients were in a hypercoagulable state; this was not detected by plasma PT or aPTT. The high incidence of pulmonary embolism indicated that our current prophylaxis regimen could be improved.Early evaluation of acute traumatic coagulopathy by thrombelastography.Posttraumatic coagulopathy is a major cause of morbidity. This prospective study evaluated the thrombelastography (TEG) system and PlateletMapping (Haemoscope Corporation, Niles, Ill) values posttrauma, and it correlated those values with transfusions and fatalities. After institutional review board approval, assays were performed on 161 trauma patients. One citrated blood sample was collected onsite (OS), and 1 citrate and 1 heparinized sample were collected within 1 h of arrival to the emergency department (ED). Paired and unpaired t-testing was performed for nominal data with chi square testing for categorical values. Except for a slight increase in clot strength (maximal amplitude (MA)), there were no significant changes from OS to the ED. None of the TEG parameters were significantly different for the 22 patients who required transfusion. PlateletMapping showed lower platelet adenosine diphosphate (ADP) responsiveness in patients who needed transfusions (MA = 22.7 +/- 17.1 vs MA = 35.7 +/- 19.3, P = 0.004) and a correlation of fibrinogen <100 mg/dL with fatalities (P = 0.013). For the 14 fatalities, TEG reaction (R) time was 3703 +/- 11,618 versus 270 +/- 393 s (P = < 0.001), and MA was 46.4 +/- 22.4 versus 64.7 +/- 9.8 mm (P < 0.001). Hyperfibrinolysis (percent fibrinolysis after 60 min (LY60) >15%) was observed in 3 patients in the ED with a 67% fatality rate (P = < 0.001 by chi-square testing). PlateletMapping assays correlated with the need for blood transfusion. The abnormal TEG System parameters correlated with fatality. These coagulopathies were already evident OS. The TEG assays can assess coagulopathy, platelet dysfunction, and hyperfibrinolysis at an early stage posttrauma and suggest more effective interventions.Can RapidTEG accelerate the search for coagulopathies in the patient with multiple injuries?Early recognition of coagulopathy may improve the care of patients with multiple injuries. Rapid thrombelastography (RapidTEG) is a new variant of thrombelastography (TEG), in which coagulation is initiated by the addition of protein tissue factor. The kinetics of coagulation and the times of measurement were compared for two variants of TEG--RapidTEG and conventional TEG, in which coagulation was initiated with kaolin. The measurements were performed on blood samples from 20 patients with multiple injuries. The RapidTEG results were also compared with conventional measurements of blood coagulation. The mean time for the RapidTEG test was 19.2 +/- 3.1 minutes (mean +/- SD), in comparison with 29.9 +/- 4.3 minutes for kaolin TEG and 34.1 +/- 14.5 minutes for conventional coagulation tests. The mean time for the RapidTEG test was 30.8 +/- 5.72 minutes, in comparison with 41.5 +/- 5.66 minutes for kaolin TEG and 64.9 +/- 18.8 for conventional coagulation tests---measured from admission of the patients to the resuscitation bay until the results were available. There were significant correlations between the RapidTEG results and those from kaolin TEG and conventional coagulation tests. RapidTEG is the most rapid available test for providing reliable information on coagulopathy in patients with multiple injuries. This has implications for improving patient care.A reduction in clot formation rate and strength assessed by thrombelastography is indicative of transfusion requirements in patients with penetrating injuries.Bleeding is a major cause of death in patients with traumatic injuries. Recently, thrombelastography (TEG) has been suggested as an additional means of evaluating coagulation in trauma patients. We hypothesized that TEG data would aid in defining the coagulopathy of trauma in patients with penetrating traumatic injuries.A retrospective study was performed of patients (n = 44) with penetrating injuries admitted to a combat support hospital during a 2-month period in 2004. Recorded data included standard laboratory data, TEG parameters, and blood product use in the first 24 hours after admission. Values were compared with clinically accepted ranges and those obtained from the Haemoscope Corporation.At admission, International Normalization Ratio, prothrombin time, and partial thromboplastin time were increased in 39% (>or=1.5), 31% (>16 seconds), and 37% (>40 seconds) of patients, respectively, suggesting hypocoagulation, but these variables did not correlate with the use of blood products (p > 0.05). TEG values obtained within 24 hours of admission (6 hours +/- 5.7 hours; median of 4.5 hours) demonstrated hypocoagulation based on delayed propagation of the clot (increased K time and reduced alpha-angle) and decreased clot strength (reduced maximal amplitude [MA]). MA correlated (r = 0.57, p < 0.01) with blood product use as well as platelet count (r = 0.61, p < 0.01). Patients with reduced MA (n = 23) used more blood products and had reduced platelet counts and hematocrit.Thrombelastography was a more accurate indicator of blood product requirements in our patient population than prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time, and International Normalization Ratio. Thrombelastography enhanced by platelet count and hematocrit can guide blood transfusion requirements.Combining early coagulation and inflammatory status improves prediction of mortality in burned and nonburned trauma patients.After injury, there is a synergistic response between inflammation and coagulation systems. We hypothesized that combining markers of these processes and standard clinical indices would improve early prediction of in- hospital mortality in burned and nonburned trauma patients.Patients admitted to the surgical or burn intensive care unit within 24 hours of injury with an anticipated stay >or=3 days were enrolled during a one year period. Upon admission, blood was drawn for thromboelastography, plasma-based clotting assays, and cytokine levels. Clinical indices and multiple organ dysfunction syndrome (MODS) scores were recorded. Candidate variables evaluated included age, percentage third degree burns, inhalation injury, percentage total body surface area burns, interleukin-6, tumor necrosis factor alpha, interleukin-8, prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time (PTT), maximal amplitude reflective of clot strength, group (burn or nonburn) and admission MODS. Multiple logistic regression with stepwise selection and likelihood ratio test was performed to identify predictors for mortality. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was constructed to assess the diagnostic performance of identified predictors. Validation of the model with an additional cohort was performed.For model development, we enrolled 25 burned and 33 nonburned trauma patients (20 blunt and 13 penetrating injuries). Fifteen deaths occurred. Multiple logistic regression analysis identified six independent risk factors for death: age, percentage third degree burns, inhalation injury, tumor necrosis factor alpha level, maximal amplitude, and MODS score with an area under ROC curve of 0.961 (95% confidence interval: 0.891, 1.000, p < 0.05). The area under the ROC curve for the validation cohort (n = 66) was 0.936 (95% confidence interval: 0.875, 0.997, p < 0.001).Our model improves prediction of in-hospital mortality in comparison to previous methods for burn and nonburn trauma patients. Furthermore, our model is equally applicable to all patients regardless of type of traumatic injury (nonburn or burn). This improvement is because of the inclusion of patient's early coagulation and inflammatory status in addition to standard clinical indices. These data provide a baseline within which to measure incremental improvements in care.Diagnosis of early coagulation abnormalities in trauma patients by rotation thrombelastography.Reagent-supported thromboelastometry with the rotation thrombelastography (e.g. ROTEM) is a whole blood assay that evaluates the visco-elastic properties during blood clot formation and clot lysis. A hemostatic monitor capable of rapid and accurate detection of clinical coagulopathy within the resuscitation room could improve management of bleeding after trauma.The goals of this study were to establish whether ROTEM correlated with standard coagulation parameters to rapidly detect bleeding disorders and whether it can help to guide transfusion.Ninety trauma patients were included in the study. At admission, standard coagulation assays were performed and ROTEM parameters such as clot formation time (CFT) and clot amplitude (CA) were obtained at 15 min (CA(15)) with two activated tests (INTEM, EXTEM) and at 10 min (CA(10)) with a test analyzing specifically the fibrin component of coagulation (FIBTEM).Trauma induced significant modifications of coagulation as assessed by standard assays and ROTEM. A significant correlation was found between prothrombin time (PT) and CA(15)-EXTEM (r = 0.66, P < 0.0001), between activated partial thromboplastin time and CFT-INTEM (r = 0.91, P < 0.0001), between fibrinogen level and CA(10)-FIBTEM (r = 0.85, P < 0.0001), and between platelet count and CA(15)-INTEM (r = 0.57, P < 0.0001). A cutoff value of CA(15)-EXTEM at 32 mm and CA(10)-FIBTEM at 5 mm presented a good sensitivity (87% and 91%) and specificity (100% and 85%) to detect a PT > 1.5 of control value and a fibrinogen less than 1 g L(-1), respectively.ROTEM is a point-of-care device that rapidly detects systemic changes of in vivo coagulation in trauma patients, and it might be a helpful device in guiding transfusion.Hypercoagulability is most prevalent early after injury and in female patients.Hypercoagulability after injury is a major source of morbidity and mortality. Recent studies indicate that there is a gender-specific risk in trauma patients. This study was performed to determine the course of coagulation after injury and to determine whether there is a gender difference. We hypothesized that hypercoagulability would occur early after injury and that there would be no difference between men and women.This was a prospective cohort study. Inclusion criteria were admission to the intensive care unit, Injury Severity Score > 4, and the ability to obtain consent from the patient or a relative. A Thrombelastograph (TEG) analysis was performed and routine coagulation parameters and thrombin-antithrombin complexes were measured within 24 hours of injury and then daily for 4 days.Sixty-five patients met criteria for entry into the study. Their mean age was 42 +/- 17 years and their mean Injury Severity Score was 23 +/- 12. Forty patients (62%) were men. The prevalence of a hypercoagulable state by TEG was 62% on day 1 and 26% on day 4 (p < 0.01). Women were significantly more hypercoagulable on day 1 than men as measured by the time to onset of clotting (women, 2.9 +/- 0.7 minutes; men, 3.9 +/- 1.5 minutes; p < 0.01; normal, 3.7-8.3 minutes). Mean platelet counts, international normalized ratios, and partial thromboplastin times were within normal limits throughout the study. Thrombin activation as measured by thrombin-antithrombin complexes decreased from 34 +/- 15 microg/L on day 1 to 18 +/- 8 microg/L (p < 0.01) on day 4, consistent with the prevalence of hypercoagulability by TEG.Hypercoagulability after injury is most prevalent during the first 24 hours. Women are more hypercoagulable than men early after injury. The TEG is more sensitive than routine coagulation assays for the detection of a hypercoagulable state.Coagulation disorders in severely and critically injured patients.Forty-five patients with multiple injuries treated at an intensive care unit were studied prospectively. The patients were divided into two groups: the severely injured (no mortality) and critically injured (56% mortality). Treatment was started within two hours from the accident in all cases. The following coagulation parameters were measured for eight days: euglobulin lysis time (ELT), thromboelastography (TEG), vecalcification time (RECA), partial thromboplastin time (PTT), factor V, factor VIII, Normotest, Thrombotest, thrombin time, fibrinogen and platelets. Severe coagulation disorders were observed in one-third of the patients 12-48 hours after trauma. The abnormalities were more pronounced in patients who had sustained very severe injuries and arrived in a state of shock. The ELT was shortened 0-6 hours after the accident and accelerated coagulation was indicated simultaneously by decreased PTT, RECA, and r-values as well as by elevated Thrombotest and factor VIII values. The factor V and fibrinogen levels were initially lowered. Low platelet values at 2-4 days, prolonged thrombin and r-times, secondary decrease of fibrinogen FV, FVIII, and low Thrombotest values suggested disseminated intravascular coagulation associated with complications, such as fat embolism and "shock lung" syndromes. General bleeding tendency with high mortality was observed in 16% of the patients.Coagulation abnormalities in subarachnoid hemorrhage.TEG-guided resuscitation is superior to standardized MTP resuscitation in massively transfused penetrating trauma patients.For nearly a decade, our center performed thromboelastograms (TEGs) to analyze coagulation profiles, allowing rapid data-driven blood component therapy. After consensus recommendations for massive transfusion protocols (MTPs), we implemented an MTP in October 2009 with 1:1:1 ratio of blood (red blood cells [RBC]), plasma (fresh-frozen plasma [FFP]), and platelets. We hypothesized that TEG-directed resuscitation is equivalent to MTP resuscitation.All patients receiving 6 units (U) or more of RBC in the first 24 hours for 21 months before and after MTP initiation in an urban Level I trauma center were examined. Demographics, mechanism of injury (MOI), Injury Severity Score (ISS), 24-hour volume of RBC, FFP, platelets, crystalloid, and 30-day mortality were compared, excluding patients with traumatic brain injuries. Variables were analyzed using Student's t-test and χ2 or Fisher's exact test.For the preMTP group, there were 165 patients. In the MTP group, there were 124 patients. There were no significant differences in ISS, age, or sex. PreMTP patients with 6U or more RBC had significantly more penetrating MOI (p = 0.017), whereas preMTP patients with 10U or more RBC had similar MOIs. All patients received less crystalloid after MTP adoption (p < 0.001). There was no difference in volume of blood products or mortality in patients receiving 6U or more RBC. Blunt trauma MTP patients who received 10U or more RBC received more FFP (p = 0.02), with no change in mortality. Penetrating trauma patients who received 10U or more RBC received a similar volume of FFP; however, mortality increased from 54.1% for MTP versus 33.3% preMTP (p = 0.04).TEG-directed resuscitation is equivalent to standardized MTP for patients receiving 6U or more RBC and for blunt MOI patients receiving 10U or more RBC. MTP therapy worsened mortality in penetrating MOI patients receiving 10U or more RBC, indicating a continued need for TEG-directed therapy. A 1:1:1 strategy may not be adequate in all patients.Therapeutic study, level IV.Point of care devices for assessing bleeding and coagulation in the trauma patient.Severe trauma is associated with bleeding, coagulopathy, and transfusion of blood and blood products, all contributing to higher rates of morbidity and mortality. The aim of this review is to focus on point-of-care devices to monitor coagulation in trauma. Close monitoring of bleeding and coagulation as well as platelet function in trauma patients allows goal-directed transfusion and an optimization of the patient's coagulation, reduces the exposure to blood products, reduces costs, and probably improves clinical outcome. Noninvasive hemoglobin measurements are not to be used in trauma patients due to a lack in specificity and sensitivity.Prehospital detection of traumatic coagulopathy.Increased focus on traumatic coagulopathy over the last decade has led to more aggressive use of hemostatic agents in resuscitation of the massively bleeding patient. Novel formulations of plasma factors and other therapeutics have opened for early intervention to prevent coagulopathy and may even be utilized in the prehospital setting. Careful selection of patients to receive hemostatic agents early during the resuscitation is of great importance due to the potential detrimental effects of this treatment. Several studies have identified coagulation parameters as reliable predictors of massive transfusion, even very early after trauma. Prothrombin time international normalized ratio (PT/INR), activated partial thromboplastin time (aPTT), fibrinogen concentration, and viscoelastic tests such as thrombelastography (TEG) and rotational thrombelastometry (RoTEM) have proved to be of value in predicting massive transfusion when performed in-hospital. PT/INR appears to be slightly more accurate than the other parameters, with a reported sensitivity of 84.8% and an area under the receiver operating curve of 0.87. Comparison studies on PT/INR, aPTT, and viscoelastic assays do suggest that caution should be taken when point-of-care (POC) methods, as opposed to conventional laboratory analyses, are used. Novel techniques for POC measurement of fibrinogen levels are currently being developed, and preclinical data suggest acceptable agreement with conventional methods. A number of factors should be considered regarding the feasibility of POC tests in the prehospital environment. In addition to environmental factors such as temperature, altitude, and humidity, electromagnetic interference issues and operators' skills must be taken into account. Coagulation parameters appear to be a useful tool in identifying patients with increased risk of massive bleeding at an early stage. Further studies are needed to determine if prehospital intervention based on POC analyses improves outcome.The incidence and magnitude of fibrinolytic activation in trauma patients.Trauma is a global disease, with over 2.5 million deaths annually from hemorrhage and coagulopathy. Overt hyperfibrinolysis is rare in trauma, and is associated with massive fatal injuries. Paradoxically, clinical trials suggest a much broader indication for antifibrinolytics.To determine the incidence and magnitude of fibrinolytic activation in trauma patients and its relationship to clot lysis as measured by thromboelastometry.A prospective cohort study of 303 consecutive trauma patients admitted between January 2007 and June 2009 was performed. Blood was drawn on arrival for thromboelastometry (TEM) and coagulation assays. Follow-up was until hospital discharge or death. TEM hyperfibrinolysis was defined as maximum clot lysis of > 15%. Fibrinolytic activation (FA) was determined according to plasmin-antiplasmin (PAP) complex and D-dimer levels. Data were collected on demographics, mechanism, severity of injury, and baseline vital signs. The primary outcome measure was 28-day mortality. The secondary outcome measures were 28-day ventilator-free days and 24-h transfusion requirement.Only 5% of patients had severe fibrinolysis on TEM, but 57% of patients had evidence of 'moderate' fibrinolysis, with PAP complex levels elevated to over twice normal (> 1500 μg L(-1)) without lysis on TEM. TEM detected clot lysis only when PAP complex levels were increased to 30 times normal (P < 0.001) and antiplasmin levels were < 75% of normal. Patients with FA had increased 28-day mortality as compared with those with no FA (12% vs. 1%, P < 0.001), fewer ventilator-free days, and longer hospital stay.FA occurs in the majority of trauma patients, and the magnitude of FA correlates with poor clinical outcome. This was not detected by conventional TEM, which is an insensitive measure of endogenous fibrinolytic activity.Rotational thromboelastometry (ROTEM)-based coagulation management in cardiac surgery and major trauma.Hyperfibrinolysis at admission is an uncommon but highly lethal event associated with shock and prehospital fluid administration.Hyperfibrinolysis (HF) has been reported to occur in a range of 2% to 34% of trauma patients. Using rapid thromboelastography (r-TEG), we hypothesized that HF is (1) rarely present at admission on patients with severe injury and (2) associated with crystalloid hemodilution. To further strengthen this hypothesis, we created an in vitro hemodilution model to improve our mechanistic understanding of the early HF.The trauma registry was queried for patients who were our highest-level trauma activations and admitted directly from the scene (October 2009-October 2010). HF was defined as more than 7.5% amplitude reduction 30 minutes after maximal amplitude (LY30). Using r-TEG, we then created an in vitro hemodilution model (0.9% NS) with and without tissue injury (addition of tissue factor and tissue plasminogen activator) to identify crystalloid volumes and injury needed to achieve specific LY30 values.Admission r-TEG values were captured on 1996 consecutive admissions. Only 41 patients (2%) had HF at admission r-TEG. The groups were similar in demographics. Compared with patients without HF, the HF group had more prehospital crystalloid (1.5 vs. 0.5 L), higher median Injury Severity Score (25 vs. 16), greater admission base deficit (20 vs. 2), and higher mortality (76% vs. 10%); all p < 0.001. Controlling for Injury Severity Score and base deficit on arrival, prehospital fluid was associated with a significant increase in likelihood of HF. In fact, each additional liter of crystalloid was associated with a 15% increased odds of HF. The in vitro model found that hemodilution to 15% of baseline and tissue factor + tissue plasminogen activator was required to achieve an LY30 of 50%.Although uncommon immediately after injury, HF is associated with prehospital crystalloid administration and shock at admission and is highly lethal. Our in vitro model confirms that tissue injury and significant crystalloid hemodilution result in severe and immediate HF.Endothelial glycocalyx degradation induces endogenous heparinization in patients with severe injury and early traumatic coagulopathy.There is emerging evidence that early trauma-induced coagulopathy (TIC) is mechanistically linked to disruption of the vascular endothelium and its glycocalyx, assessed by thrombomodulin and syndecan 1, respectively. This study evaluated if degradation of the endothelial glycocalyx and ensuing release of its heparin-like substances induce autoheparinization and thereby contributes to TIC.Prospective observational study of 77 trauma patients admitted to a Level I trauma center having blood sampled at admission. Data on demography, hematology, Injury Severity Score, transfusion requirements, 30-day mortality, and thrombelastography (TEG, concurrent kaolin-activated/kaolin-heparinase-activated) were recorded. Retrospective analysis of plasma/serum for biomarkers reflecting endothelial glycocalyx and cell damage (syndecan 1, thrombomodulin), tissue injury (histone-complexed DNA fragments), sympathoadrenal activation (adrenaline, noradrenaline), coagulation activation/anticoagulation (prothrombin fragment 1+2, fibrinogen, von Willebrand factor, factor XIII, antithrombin, protein C, activated protein C, tissue factor pathway inhibitor), fibrinolysis (tissue-type plasminogen activator, plasminogen activator inhibitor 1) and inflammation (interleukin 6, terminal complement complex). Stratification of patients was according to the degree of TEG-measured heparinization.Four patients (5.2%) displayed evidence of high-degree autoheparinization, and these patients had higher Injury Severity Score (median [interquartile range], 31 [26-37] vs. 17 [10-26]), increased glucose (median, 13.6 vs. 8.0 mmol/L), and lower hemoglobin level (median, 5.8 vs. 8.4 mmol/L) and received more transfusions during the first 1 hour (median, 5 vs. 0) and 24 hours (median, 10 vs. 0) (all p < 0.05). Importantly, patients with autoheparinization had fourfold higher syndecan 1 levels (median [interquartile range], 116 ng/mL [78-140 ng/mL] vs. 31 ng/mL [18-49 ng/mL]), and they had higher international normalized ratio (median, 1.4 vs. 1.1), thrombomodulin (median, 4.1 vs. 1.7 ng/mL) and interleukin 6 (median, 129 vs. 71 pg/mL) but lower protein C (85% vs. 109%) (all p < 0.05), indicating profound endothelial damage, coagulopathy and inflammation.Five percent of the patients with trauma in the present study had evidence of acute endogenous coagulopathy with autoheparinization by TEG, which appeared mechanistically linked to endothelial glycocalyx degradation. Acute endogenous autoheparinization may contribute to TIC.Prognostic study, level III.Admission rapid thrombelastography predicts development of pulmonary embolism in trauma patients.Injury leads to dramatic disturbances in coagulation with increased risk of bleeding followed by a hypercoagulable state. A comprehensive assessment of these coagulation abnormalities can be measured and described by thrombelastography. The purpose of this study was to identify whether admission rapid-thrombelastography (r-TEG) could identify patients at risk of developing pulmonary embolism (PE) during their hospital stay.Patients admitted between September 2009 to February 2011 who met criteria for our highest-level trauma activation and were transported directly from the scene were included in the study. PE defined as clinically suspected and computed tomography angiography confirmed PE. We evaluated r-TEG values with particular attention to the maximal amplitude (mA) parameter that is indicative of overall clot strength. Demographics, vital signs, injury severity, and r-TEG values were then evaluated. In addition to r-TEG values, gender and injury severity score (ISS) were chosen a priori for developing a multiple logistic regression model predicting development of PE.r-TEG was obtained on 2,070 consecutive trauma activations. Of these, 2.5% (53) developed PE, 97.5% (2,017) did not develop PE. Patients in the PE group were older (median age, 41 vs. 33 years, p = 0.012) and more likely to be white (69% vs. 54%, p = 0.036). None of the patients in the PE group sustained penetrating injury (0% vs. 25% in the no-PE group, p < 0.001). The PE group also had admission higher mA values (66 vs. 63, p = 0.050) and higher ISS (median, 31 vs. 19, p = 0.002). When controlling for gender, race, age, and ISS, elevated mA at admission was an independent predictor of PE with an odds ratio of 3.5 for mA > 65 and 5.8 for mA > 72.Admission r-TEG mA values can identify patients with an increased risk of in-hospital PE. Further studies are needed to determine whether alternative anticoagulation strategies should be used for these high-risk patients.Prognostic study, level III.The Rapid TEG α-Angle may be a sensitive predictor of transfusion in moderately injured blunt trauma patients.To guide the administration of blood products, coagulation screening of trauma patients should be fast and accurate. The purpose of this study was to identify the correlation between CCT and TEG in trauma, to determine which CCT or TEG parameter is most sensitive in predicting transfusion in trauma, and to define TEG cut-off points for trauma care.A six-month, prospective observational study of 76 adult patients with suspected multiple injuries was conducted at a Level 1 trauma centre of a university hospital. Physicians blinded to TEG results made the decision to transfuse based on clinical evaluation.The study results showed that conventional coagulation tests correlate moderately with Rapid TEG parameters (R: 0.44-0.61). Kaolin and Rapid TEG were more sensitive than CCTs, and the Rapid TEG α-Angle was identified as the single parameter with the greatest sensitivity (84%) and validity (77%) at a cut-off of 74.7 degrees. When the Rapid TEG α-Angle was combined with heart rate >75 bpm, or haematocrit < 41%, sensitivity (84%, 88%) and specificity (75%, 73%) were improved.Cutoff points for transfusion can be determined with the Rapid TEG α-Angle and can provide better sensitivity than CCTs, but a larger study population is needed to reproduce this finding.Fibrinogen levels during trauma hemorrhage, response to replacement therapy, and association with patient outcomes.Low fibrinogen levels are known to occur in trauma. However, the extent of fibrinogen depletion during trauma hemorrhage, the response to replacement therapy and association with patient outcomes remain unclear.The study aims were to: characterize admission fibrinogen level and correlate it with factors associated with injury; describe the time course of fibrinogen depletion and response to replacement therapy; determine the correlation of fibrinogen level with rotational thromboelastography (ROTEM) parameters; evaluate the effect of fibrinogen supplementation ex vivo; and establish the association between fibrinogen level and clinical outcomes.This was a prospective cohort study of 517 patients. Blood samples were drawn on admission and after admistration of every 4 units of packed red blood cells. Fibrinogen levels were determined with the Clauss method, and global hemostatic competence was assessed with thromboelastometry. The effect of fibrinogen supplementation was assessed in a subgroup of coagulopathic patients.Low admission fibrinogen level was independently associated with injury severity score (P < 0.01), shock (P < 0.001), and prehospital fluid volume (P < 0.001). Fibrinogen supplementation during transfusion maintained but did not augment fibrinogen levels. Administration of cryoprecipitate was associated with improved survival. ROTEM parameters correlated with fibrinogen level, and ex vivo fibrinogen administration reversed coagulopathic ROTEM parameters. Fibrinogen level was an independent predictor of mortality at 24 h and 28 days (P < 0.001).Fibrinogen level is decreased in injured patients on admission and is associated with poor outcomes. ROTEM is a rapid means of assessing hypofibrinogenemia. Earlier administration of specific fibrinogen replacement may improve outcomes, and prospective controlled trials are urgently needed.Viscoelastic clot strength predicts coagulation-related mortality within 15 minutes.Predicting refractory coagulopathy early in resuscitation of injured patients may decrease a leading cause of preventable death. We hypothesized that clot strength (G) measured by point-of-care rapid thrombelastography (r-TEG) on arrival in the emergency department can predict massive transfusion (MT) and coagulation-related mortality (MT-death).Trauma alerts/activations from May 2008 to September 2010 were reviewed. The variables included the following: age, sex, injury severity score (ISS), systolic blood pressure (SBP), base deficit (BD), traditional coagulation tests (international normalized ratio ([INR], partial thromboplastin time [PTT]), TEG-derived G, and blood products transfused within the first 6 hours. Independent predictors of 2 outcomes (MT [≥10 packed red blood cells units/6 h] and MT-related death) were identified using logistic regression. The individual predictive values of BD, INR, PTT, and G were assessed comparing the areas under the receiver operating characteristic curves (AUC ROC), while adjusting for age, ISS, and SBP.Among the 80 study patients, 48% required MT, and 21% died of MT-related complications. INR, ISS, and G were independent predictors of MT, whereas age, ISS, SBP, and G were independently associated with MT-death. The predictive power for outcome MT did not differ among INR (adjusted AUC ROC = 0.92), PTT (AUC ROC = 0.90, P = .41), or G (AUC ROC = 0.89, P = .39). For outcome MT-death, G had the greatest adjusted AUC ROC (0.93) compared with the AUC ROC for BD (0.87, P = .05), INR (0.88, P = .11), and PTT (0.89; P = .19).These data suggest that the point-of-care TEG parameter clot strength (G) provides consistent, independent prediction of MT and MT-death early in the resuscitation of injured patients.Initial experiences with point-of-care rapid thrombelastography for management of life-threatening postinjury coagulopathy.Massive transfusion (MTP) protocol design is hindered by lack of accurate assessment of coagulation. Rapid thrombelastography (r-TEG) provides point-of-care (POC) analysis of clot formation. We designed a prospective study to test the hypothesis that integrating TEG into our MTP would facilitate goal-directed therapy and provide equivalent outcomes compared to conventional coagulation testing.Thiry-four patients who received more than 6 units of red blood cells (RBCs)/6 hours who were admitted to our Level 1 trauma center after r-TEG implementation (TEG) were compared to 34 patients admitted prior to TEG implementation (Pre-TEG). Data are presented as mean±SEM.Emergency department pre-TEG versus TEG shock, and coagulation indices, were not different: systolic blood pressure (94 mmHg vs. 101 mmHg), temperature (35.3°C vs. 35.9°C), pH (7.16 vs. 7.11), base deficit (-13.0 vs. -14.7), lactate (6.5 vs. 8.1), international normalized ratio (INR; 1.59 vs. 1.83), and partial thromboplastin time (48.3 vs. 57.9). Although not significant, patients with Injury Severity Score range 26 to 35 were more frequent in the pre-TEG group. Fresh-frozen plasma (FFP):RBCs, platelets:RBCs, and cryoprecipitate (cryo):RBC ratios were not significantly different at 6 or 12 hours. INR at 6 hours did not discriminate between survivors and nonsurvivors (p=0.10), whereas r-TEG "G" value was significantly associated with survival (p=0.03), as was the maximum rate of thrombin generation (MRTG; mm/min) and total thrombin generation (TG; area under the curve) (p=0.03 for both). Patients with MRTG of more than 9.2 received significantly less components of RBCs, FFP, and cryo (p=0.048, p=0.03, and p=0.04, respectively).Goal-directed resuscitation via r-TEG appears useful for management of trauma-induced coagulopathy. Further experience with POC monitoring could result in more efficient management leading to a reduction of transfusion requirements.FIBTEM provides early prediction of massive transfusion in trauma.Prediction of massive transfusion (MT) among trauma patients is difficult in the early phase of trauma management. Whole-blood thromboelastometry (ROTEM®) tests provide immediate information about the coagulation status of acute bleeding trauma patients. We investigated their value for early prediction of MT.This retrospective study included patients admitted to the AUVA Trauma Centre, Salzburg, Austria, with an injury severity score ≥16, from whom blood samples were taken immediately upon admission to the emergency room (ER). ROTEM® analyses (extrinsically-activated test with tissue factor (EXTEM), intrinsically-activated test using ellagic acid (INTEM) and fibrin-based extrinsically activated test with tissue factor and the platelet inhibitor cytochalasin D (FIBTEM) tests) were performed. We divided patients into two groups: massive transfusion (MT, those who received ≥10 units red blood cell concentrate within 24 hours of admission) and non-MT (those who received 0 to 9 units).Of 323 patients included in this study (78.9% male; median age 44 years), 78 were included in the MT group and 245 in the non-MT group. The median injury severity score upon admission to the ER was significantly higher in the MT group than in the non-MT group (42 vs 27, P < 0.0001). EXTEM and INTEM clotting time and clot formation time were significantly prolonged and maximum clot firmness (MCF) was significantly lower in the MT group versus the non-MT group (P < 0.0001 for all comparisons). Of patients admitted with FIBTEM MCF 0 to 3 mm, 85% received MT. The best predictive values for MT were provided by hemoglobin and Quick value (area under receiver operating curve: 0.87 for both parameters). Similarly high predictive values were observed for FIBTEM MCF (0.84) and FIBTEM A10 (clot amplitude at 10 minutes; 0.83).FIBTEM A10 and FIBTEM MCF provided similar predictive values for massive transfusion in trauma patients to the most predictive laboratory parameters. Prospective studies are needed to confirm these findings.Hyperfibrinolysis diagnosed by rotational thromboelastometry (ROTEM) is associated with higher mortality in patients with severe trauma.We investigated whether hyperfibrinolysis and its severity was associated with outcome of traumatized and nontraumatized patients.From April 2008 to April 2010, all emergency patients with hyperfibrinolysis were enrolled in this study. Hyperfibrinolysis patients were divided into traumatized (trauma hyperfibrinolysis group) and nontraumatized (nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group). The trauma hyperfibrinolysis group was matched with 24 polytrauma patients without hyperfibrinolysis (matched trauma group). Data from rotational thromboelastometry measurements, blood gas analysis (metabolic state), laboratory analysis, injury severity score, and 30-day mortality were collected.Thirty-five patients with hyperfibrinolysis were identified (13 traumatized, 22 nontraumatized). Overall mortality for hyperfibrinolysis was 54%. Mortality in the trauma hyperfibrinolysis group (77%±12%) was significantly higher than in the nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group (41%±10%; P=0.001, 95% CI 5%-67%) and the matched trauma group (33%±10%; P=0.009, 95% CI 13%-74%). Hyperfibrinolysis is significantly (P=0.017) associated with mortality in trauma patients. In the blood gas analysis representing the metabolic state, only pH (P=0.02) and potassium (P=0.01) were significantly lower in the trauma hyperfibrinolysis group compared to the nontrauma hyperfibrinolysis group.Mortality from hyperfibrinolysis is significantly higher in trauma compared with nontrauma patients, and hyperfibrinolysis is an independent factor predicting mortality in trauma patients. Rotational thromboelastometry provides real-time recognition of hyperfibrinolysis allowing early treatment.Evidence based evaluation of immuno-coagulatory interventions in critical care.Cochrane systematic reviews with meta-analyses of randomised trials provide guidance for clinical practice and health-care decision-making. In case of disagreements between research evidence and clinical practice, high quality systematic reviews can facilitate implementation or deimplementation of medical interventions into clinical practice. This applies especially to treatment of critically ill patients where interventions are most often costly and the clinical conditions are associated with high mortality.To assess the potential benefits or harms of 1) antithrombin III (AT III) for critically ill patients; 2) inhaled nitric oxide (INO) for acute respiratory distress syndrome (ARDS) and acute lung injury (ALI); 3) aerosolized prostacyclin for ARDS and ALI; 4) thrombelastography (TEG) or thromboelastometry (ROTEM) to monitor haemotherapy versus usual care in patients with massive transfusion.We performed four systematic reviews of relevant randomised clinical trials. To quantify the estimated effect of various interventions, we conducted meta-analyses, where appropriate, to determine intervention effects using the Cochrane Collaboration methodology, trial sequential analyses (TSA), the GRADE, and the PRISMA-guidelines when conducting our systematic reviews. All reviews were performed according to published protocols following the recommendations of the Cochrane Handbook for systematic reviews of interventions. We performed multiple subgroup and sensitivity analyses with regard to methodological quality and various clinical outcomes. Trials were identified through Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL), MEDLINE, EMBASE Science Citation Index-Expanded, The Chinese Biomedical Database and LILACS. We included all randomized clinical trials. We hand-searched reference lists, reviews, and contacted authors and experts for additional trials. We searched ClinicalTrials.gov, Centre Watch Clinical Trials Listing Service and ControlledTrials.com for missed, unreported, or ongoing trials. We screened bibliographies of relevant articles and conference proceedings and wrote to trialists and pharmaceutical companies producing the drugs in question.Four systematic reviews included a total of 44 trials with 5,551 patients. Only 15 of the trials were classified as trials with low risk of bias (high methodological quality) regarding generation of the allocation sequence, allocation concealment, blinding, follow-up and other types of bias. 1) Compared with placebo or no intervention, AT III did not significantly affect overall mortality (relative risk (RR) 0.96, 95% confidence interval (CI) 0.89 to 1.03). No subgroup analyses on risk of bias, populations of patients, or with and without adjuvant heparin yielded significant results. AT III significantly increased the risk of bleeding events (RR 1.52, 95% CI 1.30 to 1.78). 2) INO showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (RR 1.06, 95% CI 0.93 to 1.22) and in several subgroup and sensitivity analyses, indicating robust results. Limited data demonstrated no effect of INO on duration of ventilation, ventilator-free days, and length of stay in the intensive care unit and hospital. We found a statistically significant, but transient improvement in oxygenation in the first 24 hours, expressed as the ratio of PO2 to fraction of inspired oxygen (mean difference (MD) 15.91, 95% CI 8.25 to 23.56). However, INO appears to significantly increase the risk of renal impairment among adults (RR 1.59, 95% CI 1.17 to 2.16) but did not significantly affect the risk of bleeding or methaemoglobin or nitrogen dioxide formation. 3) We found only one small low risk of bias paediatric trial examining the role of aerosolized prostacyclin in ALI or ARDS. Based on this limited amount of data, we were unable to support or refute the routine use of this intervention in ALI or ARDS. 4) Compared with standard treatment, TEG or ROTEM showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (RR 0.77, 95% CI 0.35 to 1.72) but only five trials provided data on mortality. Our analyses demonstrated a statistically significant effect of TEG or ROTEM on the amount of bleeding (MD -85.05 ml, 95% CI -140.68 to -29.42) but failed to show any statistically significant effect on other predefined outcomes. However, whether this reduction has implication for the patient's clinical condition is still uncertain.We did not find reliable evidence to support the clinical use of the assessed immuno-coagulatory interventions for general use in critical care based on the available evidence. A large proportion of the trials had serious methodological shortcomings, small number of patients, and short trial duration. The sparse data provided in the included trials may be or may not be promising but is not necessarily evidence of absence of a beneficial or harmful effect, because many of the outcome measures have not been adequately addressed so far. There is an urgent need for several randomised clinical trials with low risk of bias and low risk of random error to evaluate the use of the assessed interventions.Functional definition and characterization of acute traumatic coagulopathy.To identify an appropriate diagnostic tool for the early diagnosis of acute traumatic coagulopathy and validate this modality through prediction of transfusion requirements in trauma hemorrhage.Prospective observational cohort study.Level 1 trauma center.Adult trauma patients who met the local criteria for full trauma team activation. Exclusion criteria included emergency department arrival >2 hrs after injury, >2000 mL of intravenous fluid before emergency department arrival, or transfer from another hospital.None.Blood was collected on arrival in the emergency department and analyzed with laboratory prothrombin time, point-of-care prothrombin time, and rotational thromboelastometry. Prothrombin time ratio was calculated and acute traumatic coagulopathy defined as laboratory prothrombin time ratio >1.2. Transfusion requirements were recorded for the first 12 hrs following admission.Three hundred patients were included in the study. Laboratory prothrombin time results were available at a median of 78 (62-103) mins. Point-of-care prothrombin time ratio had reduced agreement with laboratory prothrombin time ratio in patients with acute traumatic coagulopathy, with 29% false-negative results. In acute traumatic coagulopathy, the rotational thromboelastometry clot amplitude at 5 mins was diminished by 42%, and this persisted throughout clot maturation. Rotational thromboelastometry clotting time was not significantly prolonged. Clot amplitude at a 5-min threshold of ≤35 mm had a detection rate of 77% for acute traumatic coagulopathy with a false-positive rate of 13%. Patients with clot amplitude at 5 mins ≤35 mm were more likely to receive red cell (46% vs. 17%, p < .001) and plasma (37% vs. 11%, p < .001) transfusions. The clot amplitude at 5 mins could identify patients who would require massive transfusion (detection rate of 71%, vs. 43% for prothrombin time ratio >1.2, p < .001).In trauma hemorrhage, prothrombin time ratio is not rapidly available from the laboratory and point-of-care devices can be inaccurate. Acute traumatic coagulopathy is functionally characterized by a reduction in clot strength. With a threshold of clot amplitude at 5 mins of ≤35 mm, rotational thromboelastometry can identify acute traumatic coagulopathy at 5 mins and predict the need for massive transfusion.Platelet function following trauma. A multiple electrode aggregometry study.Platelets play a central role in coagulation. Currently, information on platelet function following trauma is limited. We performed a retrospective analysis of patients admitted to the emergency room (ER) at the AUVA Trauma Centre, Salzburg, after sustaining traumatic injury. Immediately after admission to the ER, blood was drawn for blood cell counts, standard coagulation tests, and platelet function testing. Platelet function was assessed by multiplate electrode aggregometry (MEA) using adenosine diphosphate (ADPtest), collagen (COLtest) and thrombin receptor activating peptide-6 (TRAPtest) as activators. The thromboelastometric platelet component, measuring the contribution of platelets to the elasticity of the whole-blood clot, was assessed using the ROTEM device. The study included 163 patients, 79.7% were male, and the median age was 43 years. The median injury severity score was 18. Twenty patients (12.3%) died. Median platelet count was significantly lower among non-survivors than survivors (181,000/μl vs. 212,000/μl; p=0.01). Although platelet function defects were relatively minor, significant differences between survivors and non-survivors were observed in the ADPtest (94 vs. 79 U; p=0.0019), TRAPtest (136 vs. 115 U; p<0.0001), and platelet component (134 vs.103 MCEEXTEM - MCEFIBTEM; p=0.0012). Aggregometry values below the normal range for ADPtest and TRAPtest were significantly more frequent in non-survivors than in survivors (p=0.0017 and p=0.0002, respectively). Minor decreases in platelet function upon admission to the ER were a sign of coagulopathy accompanying increased mortality in patients with trauma. Further studies are warranted to confirm these results and investigate the role of platelet function in trauma haemostatic management.The prognostic value of thrombelastography in identifying neurosurgical patients with worse prognosis.Coagulopathy in patients with intracranial haemorrhage or traumatic brain injury (TBI) is associated with clinical deterioration and worse outcome. Whole blood viscoelastic haemostatic assays, like thrombelastography (TEG), might aid conventional coagulation assays in identification of patients with worse prognosis. We performed a review of patients (totalling 78 patients) with primary acute intracranial haemorrhage or isolated TBI admitted to a neurointensive care unit (NICU) for more than 24 h during a period of 9 months, who had TEG analysis performed at admission. Primary outcome was all-cause 30-day mortality, whereas decline in Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) score at 24 h after admission or death due to cerebral incarceration were secondary outcomes. Patients were defined as hypocoaguable if TEG reaction time was more than 8 min, angle less than 55° and/or maximal amplitude less than 51 mm. Patients were defined hypocoaguable according to conventional coagulation assays if international normalized ratio was more than 1.3, platelet counts less than 100×10/l and/or activated partial thromboplastine time more than 35 s. Eight patients were hypocoaguable by TEG on admission to NICU and had higher 30-day mortality (63% vs. 16%, P=0.008), more often declined in GCS (57% vs. 16%, P=0.02) and expired due to cerebral incarceration (50% vs. 6%, P=0.02). Hypocoagulability by TEG, lower admission GCS and subarachnoid haemorrhage were independently associated with higher 30-day mortality [TEG: odds ratio (OR) 14.8 (2.2-100.1), P=0.006; GCS: OR 1.3 (1.1-1.5), P=0.006; subarachnoid haemorrhage: OR: 5.3 (1.3-22.3), P=0.02]. Only two patients were hypocoaguable by both conventional coagulation assays and TEG. The current data indicate that hypocoagulability by TEG at admission to NICU predicts worse prognosis. Low concordance with conventional coagulation assays indicates that TEG might be valuable in identifying patients with clinically relevant coagulopathy.Thrombelastography (TEG) or thromboelastometry (ROTEM) to monitor haemotherapy versus usual care in patients with massive transfusion.Severe bleeding and coagulopathy as a result of massive transfusion are serious clinical conditions that are associated with high mortality. Thromboelastography (TEG) and thromboelastometry (ROTEM) are increasingly used to guide transfusion strategy but their roles remain disputed.To systematically assess the benefits and harms of a TEG or ROTEM guided transfusion strategy in randomized trials involving patients with severe bleeding.Randomized clinical trials (RCTs) were identified from electronic databases: Cochrane Central Register of Controlled Trials (CENTRAL) (The Cochrane Library 2010, Issue 9); MEDLINE; EMBASE; Science Citation Index Expanded; International Web of Science; CINAHL; LILACS; and the Chinese Biomedical Literature Database (up to 31st October 2010). We contacted trial authors, authors of previous reviews, and manufacturers in the field.We included all RCTs, irrespective of blinding or language, that compared transfusion guided by TEG or ROTEM to transfusion guided by clinical judgement and standard laboratory tests, or both.Two authors independently abstracted data; they resolved any disagreements by discussion. We presented pooled estimates of the intervention effects on dichotomous outcomes as relative risks (RR) and on continuous outcomes as mean differences, with 95% confidence intervals (CI). Our primary outcome measure was all cause mortality. We performed subgroup and sensitivity analyses to assess the effect of TEG or ROTEM in adults and children on various clinical and physiological outcomes. We assessed the risk of bias through assessment of trial methodological components and the risk of random error through trial sequential analysis.We included nine RCTs with a total of 776 participants; only one trial had a low risk of bias. We found two ongoing trials but were unable to retrieve any data from them. Compared with standard treatment, TEG or ROTEM showed no statistically significant effect on overall mortality (3.78% versus 5.11%, RR 0.77, 95% CI 0.35 to 1.72; I(2) = 0%) but only five trials provided data on mortality. Our analyses demonstrated a statistically significant effect of TEG or ROTEM on the amount of bleeding (MD -85.05 ml, 95% CI -140.68 to -29.42; I(2) = 26%) but failed to show any statistically significant effect on other predefined outcomes.There is an absence of evidence that TEG or ROTEM improves morbidity or mortality in patients with severe bleeding. Application of a TEG or ROTEM guided transfusion strategy seems to reduce the amount of bleeding but whether this has implications for the clinical condition of patients is still uncertain. More research is needed.A novel thromboelastographic score to identify overt disseminated intravascular coagulation resulting in a hypocoagulable state.Thromboelastography (TEM) yields a multitude of data that are complicated to analyze. We evaluated its value in identification of global coagulopathy in overt disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC). We studied 21 patients, each with International Society for Haemostasis and Thrombosis scores of 5 or more (compatible with overt DIC) and less than 5 (suggestive of nonovert DIC), who underwent whole blood nonadditive TEM. A TEM score based on the reaction and kappa times, alpha angle, and maximum amplitude was defined as the total number of TEM parameters deranged in the direction of hypocoagulability. The TEM score at a cutoff of 2 or more achieved sensitivity of 95.2%, specificity of 81.0%, and the highest receiver operating characteristic area under the curve of all parameters of 0.957 for identifying overt DIC. Individual TEM parameters correlated variably with conventional tests. Their combination into a cohesive TEM score possibly better captured the multiple hemostatic derangements occurring in DIC. The TEM score may bring objectivity to the analysis of TEM data.Splenectomy leads to a persistent hypercoagulable state after trauma.It was hypothesized that splenectomy following trauma results in hypercoagulability.A prospective, nonrandomized, single-center study was performed to evaluate coagulation parameters in trauma patients with splenic injury.Patients with splenectomy (n = 30) and nonoperative management (n = 50) were enrolled. Splenectomy patients were older, had higher Injury Severity Scores, and had longer intensive care unit and hospital stays (P < .05). Splenectomy patients had significantly increased white blood cell counts and platelet counts at baseline and follow-up (P < .01). Fibrinogen was initially elevated in both groups and remained elevated in the splenectomy group (P < .05). Tissue plasminogen activator, plasminogen activator inhibitor-1, and activated partial thromboplastin time were higher in splenectomy patients only at baseline (P < .05). Baseline thromboelastography showed faster fibrin cross-linking and enhanced fibrinolysis following splenectomy (P < .05). Only clot strength was greater at follow-up in the splenectomy group (P < .01). Deep venous thrombosis developed in 7% of splenectomy patients and no control patients (P = .03).A significant difference in deep venous thrombosis formation was noted, and coagulation assays indicated persistent hypercoagulability following splenectomy for trauma.Thromboelastography as a better indicator of hypercoagulable state after injury than prothrombin time or activated partial thromboplastin time.To investigate the hemostatic status of critically ill, nonbleeding trauma patients. We hypothesized that a hypercoagulable state exists in patients early after severe injury and that the pattern of clotting and fibrinolysis are similar between burned and nonburn trauma patients.Patients admitted to the surgical or burn intensive care unit within 24 hours after injury were enrolled. Blood samples were drawn on days 0 through 7. Laboratory tests included prothrombin time (PT), activated partial thromboplastin time (aPTT), levels of activated factor XI, D-dimer, protein C percent activity, antithrombin III percent activity, and thromboelastography (TEG).Study subjects were enrolled from April 1, 2004, to May 31, 2005, and included nonburn trauma patients (n = 33), burned patients (n = 25), and healthy (control) subjects (n = 20). Despite aggressive thromboprophylaxis, three subjects (2 burned and 1 nonburn trauma patients [6%]) had pulmonary embolism during hospitalization. Compared with controls, all patients had prolonged PT and aPTT (p < 0.05). The rate of clot formation (alpha angle) and maximal clot strength were higher for patients compared with those of controls (p < 0.05), indicating a hypercoagulable state. Injured patients also had lower protein C and antithrombin III percent activities and higher fibrinogen levels (p < 0.05 for all). Activated factor XI was elevated in 38% of patients (control subjects had undetectable levels).Thromboelastography analysis of whole blood showed that patients were in a hypercoagulable state; this was not detected by plasma PT or aPTT. The high incidence of pulmonary embolism indicated that our current prophylaxis regimen could be improved.Early evaluation of acute traumatic coagulopathy by thrombelastography.Posttraumatic coagulopathy is a major cause of morbidity. This prospective study evaluated the thrombelastography (TEG) system and PlateletMapping (Haemoscope Corporation, Niles, Ill) values posttrauma, and it correlated those values with transfusions and fatalities. After institutional review board approval, assays were performed on 161 trauma patients. One citrated blood sample was collected onsite (OS), and 1 citrate and 1 heparinized sample were collected within 1 h of arrival to the emergency department (ED). Paired and unpaired t-testing was performed for nominal data with chi square testing for categorical values. Except for a slight increase in clot strength (maximal amplitude (MA)), there were no significant changes from OS to the ED. None of the TEG parameters were significantly different for the 22 patients who required transfusion. PlateletMapping showed lower platelet adenosine diphosphate (ADP) responsiveness in patients who needed transfusions (MA = 22.7 +/- 17.1 vs MA = 35.7 +/- 19.3, P = 0.004) and a correlation of fibrinogen <100 mg/dL with fatalities (P = 0.013). For the 14 fatalities, TEG reaction (R) time was 3703 +/- 11,618 versus 270 +/- 393 s (P = < 0.001), and MA was 46.4 +/- 22.4 versus 64.7 +/- 9.8 mm (P < 0.001). Hyperfibrinolysis (percent fibrinolysis after 60 min (LY60) >15%) was observed in 3 patients in the ED with a 67% fatality rate (P = < 0.001 by chi-square testing). PlateletMapping assays correlated with the need for blood transfusion. The abnormal TEG System parameters correlated with fatality. These coagulopathies were already evident OS. The TEG assays can assess coagulopathy, platelet dysfunction, and hyperfibrinolysis at an early stage posttrauma and suggest more effective interventions.Can RapidTEG accelerate the search for coagulopathies in the patient with multiple injuries?Early recognition of coagulopathy may improve the care of patients with multiple injuries. Rapid thrombelastography (RapidTEG) is a new variant of thrombelastography (TEG), in which coagulation is initiated by the addition of protein tissue factor. The kinetics of coagulation and the times of measurement were compared for two variants of TEG--RapidTEG and conventional TEG, in which coagulation was initiated with kaolin. The measurements were performed on blood samples from 20 patients with multiple injuries. The RapidTEG results were also compared with conventional measurements of blood coagulation. The mean time for the RapidTEG test was 19.2 +/- 3.1 minutes (mean +/- SD), in comparison with 29.9 +/- 4.3 minutes for kaolin TEG and 34.1 +/- 14.5 minutes for conventional coagulation tests. The mean time for the RapidTEG test was 30.8 +/- 5.72 minutes, in comparison with 41.5 +/- 5.66 minutes for kaolin TEG and 64.9 +/- 18.8 for conventional coagulation tests---measured from admission of the patients to the resuscitation bay until the results were available. There were significant correlations between the RapidTEG results and those from kaolin TEG and conventional coagulation tests. RapidTEG is the most rapid available test for providing reliable information on coagulopathy in patients with multiple injuries. This has implications for improving patient care.A reduction in clot formation rate and strength assessed by thrombelastography is indicative of transfusion requirements in patients with penetrating injuries.Bleeding is a major cause of death in patients with traumatic injuries. Recently, thrombelastography (TEG) has been suggested as an additional means of evaluating coagulation in trauma patients. We hypothesized that TEG data would aid in defining the coagulopathy of trauma in patients with penetrating traumatic injuries.A retrospective study was performed of patients (n = 44) with penetrating injuries admitted to a combat support hospital during a 2-month period in 2004. Recorded data included standard laboratory data, TEG parameters, and blood product use in the first 24 hours after admission. Values were compared with clinically accepted ranges and those obtained from the Haemoscope Corporation.At admission, International Normalization Ratio, prothrombin time, and partial thromboplastin time were increased in 39% (>or=1.5), 31% (>16 seconds), and 37% (>40 seconds) of patients, respectively, suggesting hypocoagulation, but these variables did not correlate with the use of blood products (p > 0.05). TEG values obtained within 24 hours of admission (6 hours +/- 5.7 hours; median of 4.5 hours) demonstrated hypocoagulation based on delayed propagation of the clot (increased K time and reduced alpha-angle) and decreased clot strength (reduced maximal amplitude [MA]). MA correlated (r = 0.57, p < 0.01) with blood product use as well as platelet count (r = 0.61, p < 0.01). Patients with reduced MA (n = 23) used more blood products and had reduced platelet counts and hematocrit.Thrombelastography was a more accurate indicator of blood product requirements in our patient population than prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time, and International Normalization Ratio. Thrombelastography enhanced by platelet count and hematocrit can guide blood transfusion requirements.Combining early coagulation and inflammatory status improves prediction of mortality in burned and nonburned trauma patients.After injury, there is a synergistic response between inflammation and coagulation systems. We hypothesized that combining markers of these processes and standard clinical indices would improve early prediction of in- hospital mortality in burned and nonburned trauma patients.Patients admitted to the surgical or burn intensive care unit within 24 hours of injury with an anticipated stay >or=3 days were enrolled during a one year period. Upon admission, blood was drawn for thromboelastography, plasma-based clotting assays, and cytokine levels. Clinical indices and multiple organ dysfunction syndrome (MODS) scores were recorded. Candidate variables evaluated included age, percentage third degree burns, inhalation injury, percentage total body surface area burns, interleukin-6, tumor necrosis factor alpha, interleukin-8, prothrombin time, partial thromboplastin time (PTT), maximal amplitude reflective of clot strength, group (burn or nonburn) and admission MODS. Multiple logistic regression with stepwise selection and likelihood ratio test was performed to identify predictors for mortality. A receiver operating characteristic (ROC) curve was constructed to assess the diagnostic performance of identified predictors. Validation of the model with an additional cohort was performed.For model development, we enrolled 25 burned and 33 nonburned trauma patients (20 blunt and 13 penetrating injuries). Fifteen deaths occurred. Multiple logistic regression analysis identified six independent risk factors for death: age, percentage third degree burns, inhalation injury, tumor necrosis factor alpha level, maximal amplitude, and MODS score with an area under ROC curve of 0.961 (95% confidence interval: 0.891, 1.000, p < 0.05). The area under the ROC curve for the validation cohort (n = 66) was 0.936 (95% confidence interval: 0.875, 0.997, p < 0.001).Our model improves prediction of in-hospital mortality in comparison to previous methods for burn and nonburn trauma patients. Furthermore, our model is equally applicable to all patients regardless of type of traumatic injury (nonburn or burn). This improvement is because of the inclusion of patient's early coagulation and inflammatory status in addition to standard clinical indices. These data provide a baseline within which to measure incremental improvements in care.Diagnosis of early coagulation abnormalities in trauma patients by rotation thrombelastography.Reagent-supported thromboelastometry with the rotation thrombelastography (e.g. ROTEM) is a whole blood assay that evaluates the visco-elastic properties during blood clot formation and clot lysis. A hemostatic monitor capable of rapid and accurate detection of clinical coagulopathy within the resuscitation room could improve management of bleeding after trauma.The goals of this study were to establish whether ROTEM correlated with standard coagulation parameters to rapidly detect bleeding disorders and whether it can help to guide transfusion.Ninety trauma patients were included in the study. At admission, standard coagulation assays were performed and ROTEM parameters such as clot formation time (CFT) and clot amplitude (CA) were obtained at 15 min (CA(15)) with two activated tests (INTEM, EXTEM) and at 10 min (CA(10)) with a test analyzing specifically the fibrin component of coagulation (FIBTEM).Trauma induced significant modifications of coagulation as assessed by standard assays and ROTEM. A significant correlation was found between prothrombin time (PT) and CA(15)-EXTEM (r = 0.66, P < 0.0001), between activated partial thromboplastin time and CFT-INTEM (r = 0.91, P < 0.0001), between fibrinogen level and CA(10)-FIBTEM (r = 0.85, P < 0.0001), and between platelet count and CA(15)-INTEM (r = 0.57, P < 0.0001). A cutoff value of CA(15)-EXTEM at 32 mm and CA(10)-FIBTEM at 5 mm presented a good sensitivity (87% and 91%) and specificity (100% and 85%) to detect a PT > 1.5 of control value and a fibrinogen less than 1 g L(-1), respectively.ROTEM is a point-of-care device that rapidly detects systemic changes of in vivo coagulation in trauma patients, and it might be a helpful device in guiding transfusion.Hypercoagulability is most prevalent early after injury and in female patients.Hypercoagulability after injury is a major source of morbidity and mortality. Recent studies indicate that there is a gender-specific risk in trauma patients. This study was performed to determine the course of coagulation after injury and to determine whether there is a gender difference. We hypothesized that hypercoagulability would occur early after injury and that there would be no difference between men and women.This was a prospective cohort study. Inclusion criteria were admission to the intensive care unit, Injury Severity Score > 4, and the ability to obtain consent from the patient or a relative. A Thrombelastograph (TEG) analysis was performed and routine coagulation parameters and thrombin-antithrombin complexes were measured within 24 hours of injury and then daily for 4 days.Sixty-five patients met criteria for entry into the study. Their mean age was 42 +/- 17 years and their mean Injury Severity Score was 23 +/- 12. Forty patients (62%) were men. The prevalence of a hypercoagulable state by TEG was 62% on day 1 and 26% on day 4 (p < 0.01). Women were significantly more hypercoagulable on day 1 than men as measured by the time to onset of clotting (women, 2.9 +/- 0.7 minutes; men, 3.9 +/- 1.5 minutes; p < 0.01; normal, 3.7-8.3 minutes). Mean platelet counts, international normalized ratios, and partial thromboplastin times were within normal limits throughout the study. Thrombin activation as measured by thrombin-antithrombin complexes decreased from 34 +/- 15 microg/L on day 1 to 18 +/- 8 microg/L (p < 0.01) on day 4, consistent with the prevalence of hypercoagulability by TEG.Hypercoagulability after injury is most prevalent during the first 24 hours. Women are more hypercoagulable than men early after injury. The TEG is more sensitive than routine coagulation assays for the detection of a hypercoagulable state.Coagulation disorders in severely and critically injured patients.Forty-five patients with multiple injuries treated at an intensive care unit were studied prospectively. The patients were divided into two groups: the severely injured (no mortality) and critically injured (56% mortality). Treatment was started within two hours from the accident in all cases. The following coagulation parameters were measured for eight days: euglobulin lysis time (ELT), thromboelastography (TEG), vecalcification time (RECA), partial thromboplastin time (PTT), factor V, factor VIII, Normotest, Thrombotest, thrombin time, fibrinogen and platelets. Severe coagulation disorders were observed in one-third of the patients 12-48 hours after trauma. The abnormalities were more pronounced in patients who had sustained very severe injuries and arrived in a state of shock. The ELT was shortened 0-6 hours after the accident and accelerated coagulation was indicated simultaneously by decreased PTT, RECA, and r-values as well as by elevated Thrombotest and factor VIII values. The factor V and fibrinogen levels were initially lowered. Low platelet values at 2-4 days, prolonged thrombin and r-times, secondary decrease of fibrinogen FV, FVIII, and low Thrombotest values suggested disseminated intravascular coagulation associated with complications, such as fat embolism and "shock lung" syndromes. General bleeding tendency with high mortality was observed in 16% of the patients.Coagulation abnormalities in subarachnoid hemorrhage.